    3d-graphics-examples programs: Examples of 3D graphics programming with OpenGL (bsd3, program)
    4Blocks program: A tetris-like game (works with GHC 6.8.3 and Gtk2hs 0.9.13) (bsd3, program)
    AERN-Basics library and program: foundational type classes for approximating exact real numbers (bsd3, library, program)
    AERN-Real-Double library and programs: arbitrary precision real interval arithmetic (bsd3, library, program)
    ActionKid library and program: An easy-to-use video game framework for Haskell. (bsd3, library, program)
    Adaptive library and program: Library for incremental computing. (bsd3, library, program)
    Adaptive-Blaisorblade library and program: Library for incremental computing. (bsd3, library, program)
    Advgame program: Lisperati's adventure game in Lisp translated to Haskell (bsd3, program)
    Agda library and programs: A dependently typed functional programming language and proof assistant (library, program)
    Agda-executable program: Command-line program for type-checking and compiling Agda programs (deprecated, program)
    AlgorithmW program: Example implementation of Algorithm W for Hindley-Milner type inference. (bsd3, program)
    Allure program: Near-future Sci-Fi roguelike and tactical squad game (agpl, program)
    AndroidViewHierarchyImporter program: Android view hierarchy importer (bsd3, program)
    Ansi2Html program: Convert ANSI Terminal Sequences to nice HTML markup (bsd3, program)
    ApplePush library and program: Library for Apple Push Notification Service (bsd3, library, program)
    Attrac program: Visualisation of Strange Attractors in 3-Dimensions (bsd3, program)
    Aurochs program: Yet another parser generator for C/C++ (bsd3, program)
    BCMtools library and program: Big Contact Map Tools (library, mit, program)
    BNFC library and program: A compiler front-end generator. (gpl, library, program)
    Barracuda library and program: An ad-hoc P2P chat program (gpl, library, program)
    Befunge93 program: An interpreter for the Befunge-93 Programming Language (bsd3, program)
    BigPixel program: Image editor for pixel art (bsd3, program)
    BiobaseFasta library and program: conduit-based FASTA parser (gpl, library, program)
    BiobaseTrainingData library and program: RNA folding training data (gpl, library, program)
    BiobaseXNA library and program: Efficient RNA/DNA representations (gpl, library, program)
    BirdPP program: A preprocessor for Bird-style Literate Haskell comments with Haddock markup. (gpl, program)
    Blobs library and program: Diagram editor (lgpl, library, program)
    BlogLiterately library and program: A tool for posting Haskelly articles to blogs (gpl, library, program)
    BlogLiterately-diagrams library and program: Include images in blog posts with inline diagrams code (bsd3, library, program)
    Bookshelf program: A simple document organizer with some wiki functionality (gpl, program)
    Buster program: Hits a set of urls periodically to bust caches (mit, program)
    CCA library and program: preprocessor and library for Causal Commutative Arrows (CCA) (bsd3, library, program)
    CMCompare library and program: Infernal covariance model comparison (gpl, library, program)
    CPBrainfuck program: A simple Brainfuck interpretter. (bsd3, program)
    CPL program: An interpreter of Hagino's Categorical Programming Language (CPL). (bsd3, program)
    CSPM-cspm library and program: cspm command line tool for analyzing CSPM specifications. (bsd3, library, program)
    CabalSearch program: Search cabal packages by name (bsd3, program)
    CarneadesIntoDung library and program: A translation from the Carneades argumentation model into Dung's AFs. (bsd3, library, program)
    CheatSheet program: A Haskell cheat sheet in PDF and literate formats. (bsd3, program)
    Chitra program: A platform independent mechanism to render graphics using vnc. (bsd3, program)
    ClustalParser library and program: Libary for parsing Clustal tools output (gpl, library, program)
    Combinatorrent program: A concurrent bittorrent client (bsd3, program)
    Commando library and program: Watch some files; Rerun a command (library, mit, program)
    Condor library and program: Information retrieval library (bsd3, library, program)
    Conscript program: Restart a command on STDIN activity (mit, program)
    Craft3e library and programs: Code for Haskell: the Craft of Functional Programming, 3rd ed. (library, mit, program)
    Crypto library and programs: Collects together existing Haskell cryptographic functions into a package (library, program)
    CurryDB library and programs: CurryDB: In-memory Key/Value Database (bsd3, library, program)
    DAG-Tournament program: Real-Time Game Tournament Evaluator (gpl, program)
    DAV library and program: RFC 4918 WebDAV support (gpl, library, program)
    DBlimited program: A command-line SQL interface for flat files (tdf,csv,etc.) (bsd3, program)
    DMuCheck program: Distributed Mutation Analysis framework for MuCheck (gpl, program)
    DPM library and program: Darcs Patch Manager (gpl, library, program)
    DSH library and program: Database Supported Haskell (bsd3, library, program)
    DSTM library and programs: A framework for using STM within distributed systems (lgpl, library, program)
    Dao library and program: Dao is meta programming language with its own built-in interpreted language, designed with artificial intelligence applications in mind. (gpl, library, program)
    Deadpan-DDP library and program: Write clients for Meteor's DDP Protocol (library, mit, program)
    DefendTheKing programs: A simple RTS game (gpl, program)
    DisTract library and programs: Distributed Bug Tracking System (bsd3, library, program)
    Dish library and program: Hash modules (currently Murmur3) (bsd3, library, program)
    DnaProteinAlignment library and program: Frameshift-aware alignment of protein sequences with DNA sequences (gpl, library, program)
    DocTest program: Test interactive Haskell examples (deprecated, mit, program)
    DrHylo library and program: A tool for deriving hylomorphisms (bsd3, library, program)
    DrIFT library and programs: Program to derive type class instances (bsd3, library, program)
    DrIFT-cabalized programs: Program to derive type class instances (bsd3, deprecated, program)
    Dung library and program: An implementation of the Dung argumentation frameworks. (bsd3, library, program)
    Dust-tools library and programs: Network filtering exploration tools (gpl, library, program)
    Dust-tools-pcap programs: Network filtering exploration tools that rely on pcap (gpl, program)
    DynamicTimeWarp library and programs: Dynamic time warping of sequences. (lgpl, library, program)
    Ebnf2ps program: Peter's Syntax Diagram Drawing Tool (bsd3, program)
    EditTimeReport program: Query language and report generator for edit logs. (gpl, program)
    Elm library and programs: The Elm language module. (bsd3, deprecated, library, program)
    Emping program: derives heuristic rules from nominal data (gpl, program)
    Encode library and programs: Encoding character data (gpl, library, program)
    Eq program: Render math formula in ASCII, and perform some simplifications (bsd3, deprecated, program)
    EtaMOO program: A new implementation of the LambdaMOO server (bsd3, program)
    Etage-Graph library and program: Data-flow based graph algorithms (lgpl, library, program)
    Eternal10Seconds program: A 2-D shooting game (bsd3, program)
    Etherbunny library and program: A network analysis toolkit for Haskell (gpl, library, program)
    FComp library and program: Compose music (gpl, library, program)
    FM-SBLEX programs: A set of computational morphology tools for Swedish diachronic lexicons. (gpl, program)
    FTPLine program: A command-line FTP client. (bsd3, program)
    FermatsLastMargin program: Annotate ps and pdf documents (gpl, program)
    Flippi program: Wiki (bsd3, program)
    Folly library and programs: A first order logic library in Haskell (bsd3, library, program)
    FormalGrammars library and program: (Context-free) grammars in formal language theory (gpl, library, program)
    Foster program: Utilities to generate and solve puzzles (mit, program)
    Frank program: An experimental programming language with typed algebraic effects (program, public-domain)
    FunGEn library and programs: A lightweight, cross-platform, OpenGL/GLUT-based game engine. (bsd3, library, program)
    Fungi program: Funge-98 interpreter written in Haskell (bsd3, program)
    GGg program: GGg cipher (mit, program)
    GLFW-b-demo program: GLFW-b demo (bsd3, program)
    GPipe-Examples programs: Examples for the GPipes package (gpl, program)
    Ganymede program: An Io interpreter in Haskell. (bsd3, program)
    GeBoP program: Several games (bsd3, program)
    GenI library and program: A natural language generator (specifically, an FB-LTAG surface realiser) (gpl, library, program)
    GenSmsPdu program: Automatic SMS message generator (bsd3, program)
    Genbank library and program: Libary for processing the NCBI genbank format (gpl, library, program)
    GlomeView program: SDL Frontend for Glome ray tracer (gpl, program)
    Graph500 library and program: Graph500 benchmark-related definitions and data set generator. (gpl, library, program)
    GraphHammer-examples library and program: Test harness for TriangleCount analysis. (gpl, library, program)
    GrowlNotify library and program: Notification utility for Growl. (bsd3, library, program)
    GuiHaskell program: A graphical REPL and development environment for Haskell (bsd3, program)
    HARM library and programs: A simple ARM emulator in haskell (library, program)
    HCL library and program: High-level library for building command line interfaces. (bsd3, library, program)
    HListPP library and program: A preprocessor for HList labelable labels (bsd3, library, program)
    HLogger library and program: Simple, concurrent and easy-to-use logging library (bsd3, deprecated, library, program)
    HNM library and program: Happy Network Manager (bsd3, library, program)
    HOpenCV library and program: A binding for the OpenCV computer vision library (bsd3, library, program)
    HPath library and program: Extract Haskell declarations by name. (bsd3, library, program)
    HPlot library and program: A minimal monadic PLplot interface for Haskell (bsd3, library, program)
    HPong program: A simple OpenGL Pong game based on GLFW (gpl, program)
    HRay program: Haskell raytracer (bsd3, program)
    HSFFIG library and programs: Generate FFI import declarations from C include files (bsd3, library, program)
    HSGEP library and program: Gene Expression Programming evolutionary algorithm in Haskell (bsd3, library, program)
    HTF library and program: The Haskell Test Framework (lgpl, library, program)
    HTab program: Tableau based theorem prover for hybrid logics (gpl, program)
    HTicTacToe program: An SDL tic-tac-toe game. (mit, program)
    HXMPP library and program: A (prototyped) easy to use XMPP library (bsd3, deprecated, library, program)
    HaLeX library and program: HaLeX enables modelling, manipulation and animation of regular languages (library, program, public-domain)
    HaRe library and program: the Haskell Refactorer. (bsd3, library, program)
    HaTeX-meta program: This package is deprecated. From version 3, HaTeX does not need this anymore. (bsd3, deprecated, program)
    HaVSA library and program: An implementation of the Version Space Algebra learning framework. (bsd3, library, program)
    HaXml library and programs: Utilities for manipulating XML documents (lgpl, library, program)
    Hach library and programs: Simple chat (library, mit, program)
    HackMail library and program: A Procmail Replacement as Haskell EDSL (bsd3, library, program)
    HarmTrace library and program: Harmony Analysis and Retrieval of Music (gpl, library, program)
    Haschoo program: Minimalist R5RS Scheme interpreter (bsd3, deprecated, program)
    Hashell program: Simple shell written in Haskell (gpl, program)
    HaskellTorrent program: A concurrent bittorrent client (bsd3, program)
    HaskellTutorials program: Haskell Tutorials by Evgeny Ukhanov (mit, program, tutorial)
    Haskelloids program: A reproduction of the Atari 1979 classic "Asteroids" (bsd3, program)
    Hayoo programs: The Hayoo! search engine for Haskell API search on hackage (mit, program)
    Hedi library and program: Line oriented editor (bsd3, library, program)
    HipmunkPlayground program: A playground for testing Hipmunk. (program)
    Hmpf program: An MPD client designed for a Home Theatre PC (gpl, program)
    Holumbus-Distribution library and programs: intra- and inter-program communication (library, program)
    Holumbus-MapReduce library and programs: a distributed MapReduce framework (library, program)
    Holumbus-Storage library and programs: a distributed storage system (library, program)
    Hricket program: A Cricket scoring application. (bsd3, program)
    Hs2lib library and programs: A Library and Preprocessor that makes it easier to create shared libs from Haskell programs. (bsd3, library, program)
    Hsed library and program: Stream Editor in Haskell (bsd3, library, program)
    IFS library and program: Iterated Function System generation for Haskell (bsd3, library, program)
    INblobs program: Editor and interpreter for Interaction Nets (lgpl, program)
    Javasf program: A utility to print the SourceFile attribute of one or more Java class files. (bsd3, deprecated, program)
    Javav program: A utility to print the target version of Java class files. (bsd3, deprecated, program)
    JsContracts library and program: Design-by-contract for JavaScript (bsd3, library, program)
    KdTree library and program: KdTree, for efficient search in K-dimensional point clouds. (bsd3, library, program)
    KiCS library and programs: A compiler from Curry to Haskell (library, program)
    KiCS-debugger library and program: debug features for kics (library, program)
    KiCS-prophecy library and program: a transformation used by the kics debugger (library, program)
    L-seed library and program: Plant growing programming game (bsd3, library, program)
    LambdaCalculator program: A basic lambda calculator with beta reduction and a REPL (bsd3, program)
    LambdaHack library and program: A game engine library for roguelike dungeon crawlers (bsd3, library, program)
    LambdaINet program: Graphical Interaction Net Evaluator for Optimal Evaluation (bsd3, program)
    LambdaShell program: Simple shell for evaluating lambda expressions (gpl, program)
    LazyVault program: A simple sandboxing tool for Haskell packages. (gpl, program)
    Level0 program: A Snake II clone written using SDL. (gpl, program)
    LinkChecker program: Check a bunch of local html files for broken links (bsd3, program)
    LslPlus program: An execution and testing framework for the Linden Scripting Language (LSL) (bsd3, program)
    MC-Fold-DP library and program: Folding algorithm based on nucleotide cyclic motifs. (gpl, library, program)
    MazesOfMonad program: Console-based Role Playing Game (bsd3, program)
    Mhailist program: Haskell mailing list manager (bsd3, program)
    MiniAgda program: A toy dependently typed programming language with type-based termination. (program)
    Moe library and program: A FRP library based on signal functions. (bsd3, library, program)
    MonadLab library and program: Automatically generate layered monads (bsd3, library, program)
    Monadius program: 2-D arcade scroller (gpl, program)
    Monaris program: A simple tetris clone (bsd3, program)
    MuCheck-HUnit library and program: Automated Mutation Testing for HUnit tests (gpl, library, program)
    MuCheck-Hspec library and program: Automated Mutation Testing for Hspec tests (gpl, library, program)
    MuCheck-QuickCheck library and program: Automated Mutation Testing for QuickCheck tests (gpl, library, program)
    MuCheck-SmallCheck library and program: Automated Mutation Testing for SmallCheck tests (gpl, library, program)
    NGrams program: Simple application for calculating n-grams using Google. (bsd3, program)
    NXT library and programs: A Haskell interface to Lego Mindstorms NXT (lgpl, library, program)
    NXTDSL library and program: Generate NXC Code from DSL (bsd3, library, program)
    NanoProlog library and program: Very small interpreter for a Prolog-like language (bsd3, library, program)
    Neks library and programs: Simple networked key/value store (library, mit, program)
    Network-NineP library and program: High-level abstraction over 9P protocol (library, program)
    Ninjas program: Ninja game (bsd3, program)
    NoSlow programs: Microbenchmarks for various array libraries (bsd3, program)
    Nomyx program: A Nomic game in haskell (bsd3, program)
    Nussinov78 library and program: Nussinov78 using the ADPfusion library. (gpl, library, program)
    OpenAFP-Utils programs: Assorted utilities to work with AFP data streams (program, public-domain)
    PTQ programs: An implementation of Montague's PTQ. (lgpl, program)
    PageIO library and program: Page-oriented extraction and composition library (bsd3, library, program)
    PandocAgda library and program: Pandoc support for literate Agda (bsd3, library, program)
    PastePipe library and program: CLI for pasting to lpaste.net (gpl, library, program)
    PlayHangmanGame program: Play Hangman Game (bsd3, program)
    PlslTools program: So far just a lint like program for PL/SQL. Diff and refactoring tools are planned (bsd3, program)
    Pollutocracy program: An imaginary world (gpl, program)
    PortFusion program: high-performance distributed reverse / forward proxy & tunneling for TCP (gpl, program)
    PropLogic library and program: Propositional Logic (bsd3, library, program)
    Proper library and programs: An implementation of propositional logic in Haskell (bsd3, library, program)
    Pugs program: A Perl 6 Implementation (bsd3, program)
    Pup-Events library and program: A networked event handling framework for hooking into other programs. (gpl, library, program)
    Pup-Events-Demo programs: A networked event handling framework for hooking into other programs. (gpl, program)
    QuickAnnotate library and program: Annotation Framework (bsd3, library, program)
    RMP library and programs: Binding to code that controls a Segway RMP (bsd3, library, program)
    RNAFold library and programs: RNA secondary structure prediction (gpl, library, program)
    RNAFoldProgs programs: RNA secondary structure folding (gpl, program)
    RNAdesign library and program: Multi-target RNA sequence design (gpl, library, program)
    RNAdraw library and program: Draw RNA secondary structures (gpl, library, program)
    RNAwolf library and programs: RNA folding with non-canonical basepairs and base-triplets. (gpl, library, program)
    Raincat program: A puzzle game written in Haskell with a cat in lead role (bsd3, program)
    Randometer program: Randomness intuition trainer (mit, program)
    Ranka program: HTTP to XMPP omegle chats gate. (gpl, program)
    Rasenschach program: Soccer simulation (bsd3, program)
    ReadArgs library and program: Simple command line argument parsing (bsd3, library, program)
    Referees library and program: A utility for computing distributions of material to review among reviewers. (gpl, library, program)
    ReviewBoard library and programs: Haskell bindings to ReviewBoard (bsd3, library, program)
    RollingDirectory program: Limits the size of a directory's contents (gpl, program)
    SGdemo program: An example of using the SG and OpenGL libraries (gpl, program)
    SVG2Q program: Code generation tool for Quartz code from a SVG. (bsd3, program)
    SableCC2Hs library and program: Generate a parser (in Haskell) with the SableCC parser generator. (bsd3, library, program)
    Saturnin library and program: Saturnin CI / Job System (bsd3, library, program)
    ScratchFs program: Size limited temp filesystem based on fuse (gpl, program)
    Scurry program: A cross platform P2P VPN application built using Haskell. (bsd3, program)
    Semantique program: Command-line tool for maintaining the Semantique database. (program, public-domain)
    ShellCheck library and program: Shell script analysis tool (gpl, library, program)
    Shu-thing program: A vector shooter game (bsd3, program)
    Snusmumrik programs: E-library directory based on FUSE virtual file system. (bsd3, deprecated, program)
    SoccerFun library and program: Football simulation framework for teaching functional programming (bsd3, library, program)
    SoccerFunGL library and programs: OpenGL UI for the SoccerFun framework (bsd3, library, program)
    SourceGraph program: Static code analysis using graph-theoretic techniques. (gpl, program)
    SpaceInvaders program: Video game (bsd3, program)
    SpacePrivateers program: Simple space pirate roguelike (bsd3, program)
    Stasis library and program: A simple MVCC like library (bsd3, library, program)
    Strafunski-Sdf2Haskell program: Converts SDF to Haskell (bsd3, program)
    SuffixStructures library and program: Suffix array construction (bsd3, library, program)
    TBC library and program: Testing By Convention (bsd3, library, program)
    Tables program: A client for Quill databases (bsd3, program)
    Tablify program: Tool to render CSV into tables of various formats (bsd3, program)
    TernaryTrees library and program: Efficient pure ternary tree Sets and Maps (bsd3, library, program)
    TimePiece library and program: A simple tile-based digital clock screen saver (library, program, public-domain)
    Titim program: Game for Lounge Marmelade (gpl, program)
    Top library and program: Constraint solving framework employed by the Helium Compiler. (gpl, library, program)
    TransformersStepByStep program: Tutorial on monad transformers. (bsd3, program)
    TypeClass program: Typing speed game (bsd3, program)
    TypeIlluminator program: TypeIlluminator is a prototype tool exploring debugging of type errors/ (bsd3, program)
    TypingTester program: Command Line Typing speed tester (gpl, program)
    UMM program: A small command-line accounting tool (gpl, program)
    VKHS library and programs: Provides access to Vkontakte social network via public API (bsd3, library, program)
    WAVE library and program: WAVE audio file IO library (bsd3, library, program)
    WL500gPControl programs: A simple command line tools to control the Asus WL500gP router (bsd3, program)
    WL500gPLib library and program: A simple library to access to the WL 500gP router from the Haskell code (bsd3, library, program)
    WashNGo library and programs: WASH is a family of EDSLs for programming Web applications in Haskell. (bsd3, library, program)
    WeberLogic library and program: Logic interpreter (bsd3, library, program)
    Webrexp library and program: Regexp-like engine to scrap web data (bsd3, library, program)
    Wordlint library and program: Plaintext prose redundancy linter. (library, program)
    XSaiga library and program: An implementation of a polynomial-time top-down parser suitable for NLP (bsd3, library, program)
    Xec program: Gtk command launcher with identicon (bsd3, program)
    YACPong program: Yet Another Pong Clone using SDL. (mit, program)
    YamlReference library and programs: YAML reference implementation (lgpl, library, program)
    Yogurt-Standalone program: A functional MUD client (bsd3, program)
    ZMachine program: A Z-machine interpreter (bsd3, program)
    a50 program: Compare genome assemblies (gpl, program)
    abc-puzzle program: Generate instances of the ABC Logic Puzzle. (bsd3, program)
    accelerate-cublas library and program: Basic Linear Algebra using native CUBLAS library (bsd3, library, program)
    accelerate-fourier-benchmark program: Compare different implementations of the Fast Fourier Transform (bsd3, program)
    acme-cutegirl library and program: Maybe gives you a cute girl (gpl, library, program)
    acme-http library and programs: fastest Haskell PONG server in the world (bsd3, library, program)
    acme-inator library and program: Evil inventions in the Tri-State area (library, program, public-domain)
    activehs program: Haskell code presentation tool (bsd3, program)
    adblock2privoxy program: Convert adblock config files to privoxy format (gpl, program)
    addLicenseInfo program: Adds license info to the top of a file. (bsd3, program)
    adobe-swatch-exchange library and programs: parse Adobe Swatch Exchange files and (optionally) output .css files with the colors (bsd3, library, program)
    aeson-diff library and programs: Extract and apply patches to JSON documents. (bsd3, library, program)
    afv program: Infinite state model checking of iterative C programs. (bsd3, program)
    agda-server program: Http server for Agda (prototype) (bsd3, program)
    agum library and program: Unification and Matching in an Abelian Group (gpl, library, program)
    airship library and program: A Webmachine-inspired HTTP library (library, mit, program)
    ajhc library and programs: Haskell compiler that produce binary through C language (gpl, library, program)
    alea program: a diceware passphrase generator (mit, program)
    alex program: Alex is a tool for generating lexical analysers in Haskell (bsd3, program)
    algebra-sql library and programs: Relational Algebra and SQL Code Generation (bsd3, library, program)
    align-text program: A simple unix filter to align text on specified substrings (mit, program)
    alms program: a practical affine language (bsd3, program)
    alpha program: A compiler for the Alpha language (bsd3, program)
    alpino-tools library and programs: Alpino data manipulation tools (library, program)
    alsa-gui programs: Some simple interactive programs for sending MIDI control messages via ALSA (bsd3, program)
    alsa-midi library and programs: Bindings for the ALSA sequencer API (MIDI stuff) (deprecated, gpl, library, program)
    alsa-pcm-tests programs: Tests for the ALSA audio signal library. (bsd3, deprecated, program)
    alsa-seq-tests programs: Tests for the ALSA sequencer library. (bsd3, deprecated, program)
    amazon-emailer programs: A queue daemon for Amazon's SES with a PostgreSQL table as a queue. (bsd3, program)
    amazon-products library and program: Connector for Amazon Products API (library, mit, program)
    ampersand program: Toolsuite for automated design of business processes. (gpl, program)
    amqp library and program: Client library for AMQP servers (currently only RabbitMQ) (bsd3, library, program)
    amrun program: Interpreter for AM (gpl, program)
    anansi library and program: Simple literate programming preprocessor (gpl, library, program)
    anatomy library and program: Anatomy: Atomo documentation system (bsd3, library, program)
    angel program: Process management and supervision daemon (bsd3, program)
    antagonist library and program: A web interface to Antisplice dungeons. (agpl, library, program)
    antfarm library and program: Referring expressions for definitions (bsd3, library, program)
    anticiv library and program: This is an IRC bot for Mafia and Resistance. (agpl, library, program)
    antimirov library and program: Define the language containment (=subtyping) relation on regulare expressions. (gpl, library, program)
    antlrc library and program: Haskell binding to the ANTLR parser generator C runtime library. (bsd3, library, program)
    apelsin program: Server and community browser for the game Tremulous (gpl, program)
    api-tools library and program: DSL for generating API boilerplate and docs (bsd3, library, program)
    apotiki library and program: a faster debian repository (library, mit, program)
    appc library and program: app container types and tools (library, mit, program)
    approx-rand-test library and programs: Approximate randomization test (library, program, randomization, statistics)
    ar-timestamp-wiper library and program: Wipes time stamps from .a files (like ar -D) (library, mit, program)
    arb-fft library and program: Pure Haskell arbitrary length FFT library (bsd3, library, program)
    arbtt programs: Automatic Rule-Based Time Tracker (gpl, program)
    archive library and program: A library and programs for creating hardlinked incremental archives or backups (bsd3, library, program)
    archiver library and program: Archive supplied URLs in WebCite & Internet Archive (bsd3, library, program)
    archlinux-web library and programs: Website maintenance for Arch Linux packages (bsd3, library, program)
    archnews program: Convert Arch Linux package updates in RSS to pretty markdown (bsd3, program)
    arguedit program: A computer assisted argumentation transcription and editing software. (gpl, program)
    ariadne program: Go-to-definition for Haskell (mit, program)
    arion program: Watcher and runner for Hspec (TDD, hspec, mit, program, red-green-refactor, testing, tools)
    armada program: Space-based real time strategy game (gpl, program)
    arpa library and program: Library for reading ARPA n-gram models (bsd3, library, program)
    array-forth library and program: A simple interpreter for arrayForth, the language used on GreenArrays chips. (gpl, library, program)
    arrowp program: preprocessor translating arrow notation into Haskell 98 (gpl, program)
    ascii-vector-avc library and program: Process Ascii Vectors for Advantest 93k (gpl, library, program)
    asciidiagram library and program: Pretty rendering of Ascii diagram into svg or png. (bsd3, library, program)
    asic program: Action Script Instrumentation Compiler (lgpl, program)
    asn1dump program: Dump ASN1 structure (bsd3, program)
    assembler library and program: Haskell Assembler (bsd3, library, program)
    astrds program: an incomplete 2d space game (bsd3, program)
    astview program: A GTK-based abstract syntax tree viewer for custom languages and parsers (bsd4, deprecated, program)
    async-manager library and program: A thread manager for async (bsd3, library, program)
    aterm-utils library and program: Utility functions for working with aterms as generated by Minitermite (bsd3, library, program)
    atomo program: A highly dynamic, extremely simple, very fun programming language. (bsd3, program)
    atuin program: Embedded Turtle language compiler in Haskell, with Epic output (bsd3, program)
    augeas library and program: A Haskell FFI wrapper for the Augeas API (lgpl, library, program)
    augur program: Renaming media collections in a breeze. (bsd3, program)
    autonix-deps-kf5 library and program: Generate dependencies for KDE 5 Nix expressions (bsd3, library, program)
    autoproc library and program: EDSL for Procmail scripts (bsd3, library, program)
    aws-ec2 library and programs: AWS EC2/VPC, ELB and CloudWatch client library for Haskell (bsd3, library, program)
    aws-kinesis-client library and program: A producer & consumer client library for AWS Kinesis (apache, library, program)
    aws-kinesis-reshard library and program: Reshard AWS Kinesis streams in response to Cloud Watch metrics (apache, library, program)
    aws-performance-tests library and program: Performance Tests for the Haskell bindings for Amazon Web Services (AWS) (library, mit, program)
    b9 library and program: A tool and library for building virtual machine images. (library, mit, program)
    babylon program: An implementation of a simple 2-player board game (gpl, program)
    backdropper library and program: Rotates backdrops for X11 displays using Imagemagic. (gpl, library, program)
    bacteria program: braindead utility to compose Xinerama backgrounds (program)
    bake library and program: Continuous integration system (bsd3, library, program)
    bamboo-launcher program: bamboo-launcher (gpl, program)
    bamstats library and program: A program to extract various information from BAM alignmnet files. (gpl, library, program)
    barchart library and program: Creating Bar Charts in Haskell (bsd3, library, program)
    barley program: A web based environment for learning and tinkering with Haskell (program)
    baskell program: An interpreter for a small functional language (gpl, program)
    bdo library and program: Update CSS in the browser without reloading the page. (bsd3, library, program)
    beautifHOL program: A pretty-printer for higher-order logic (gpl, program)
    bein programs: Bein is a provenance and workflow management system for bioinformatics. (deprecated, gpl, program)
    berp library and program: An implementation of Python 3. (bsd3, library, program)
    bidirectionalization-combined programs: Prototype Implementation of Combining Syntactic and Semantic Bidirectionalization (ICFP'10) (program, public-domain)
    billboard-parser library and program: A parser for the Billboard chord dataset (lgpl, library, program)
    billeksah-main program: Leksah plugin base (lgpl, program)
    billeksah-main-static program: Leksah plugin base (lgpl, program)
    bindings-codec2 library and program: Very low-level FFI bindings for Codec2 (gpl, library, program)
    bindings-hamlib library and program: Hamlib bindings for Haskell (lgpl, library, program)
    bindings-saga-cmd library and programs: Wrapping saga_cmd (gpl, library, program)
    bindings-sipc library and programs: Low level bindings to SIPC. (lgpl, library, program)
    binembed library and program: Embed data into object files. (bsd3, library, program)
    binembed-example program: Example project using binembed to embed data in object files. (bsd3, program)
    biopsl library and programs: Library and executables for working with PSL files (lgpl, library, program)
    bird library and program: A simple, sinatra-inspired web framework. (bsd3, library, program)
    bitly-cli program: A command line tool to access bit.ly URL shortener. (bsd3, deprecated, program)
    bitspeak program: Proof-of-concept tool for writing using binary choices. (gpl, program)
    bkr library and program: Backup utility for backing up to cloud storage services (S3 only right now) (bsd3, library, program)
    bla program: a stupid cron (bsd3, deprecated, program)
    black-jewel program: The pirate bay client. (gpl, program)
    blakesum-demo program: The BLAKE SHA-3 candidate hashes, in Haskell (bsd3, program)
    blaze-from-html program: Tool to convert HTML to BlazeHtml code. (bsd3, program)
    blink1 library and program: Control library for blink(1) LED from ThingM (bsd3, library, program)
    blip program: Python to bytecode compiler. (bsd3, program)
    blogination library and program: Very simple static blog software (bsd3, deprecated, library, program)
    bloxorz program: OpenGL Logic Game (gpl, program)
    bluetile programs: full-featured tiling for the GNOME desktop environment (bsd3, program)
    bluetileutils program: Utilities for Bluetile (bsd3, deprecated, program)
    blunt library and program: Convert between pointfree and pointful expressions. (library, mit, program)
    bogre-banana library and program: (bsd3, library, program)
    boomange program: A Bookmarks manager with a HTML generator (gpl, program)
    boomslang program: Boomshine clone (program, public-domain)
    botpp library and program: Build tool for Lambdabot (gpl, library, program)
    brainfuck library and program: Brainfuck interpreter (gpl, library, program)
    brainfuck-tut library and program: A simple BF interpreter. (bsd3, library, program)
    breakout program: A simple Breakout game implementation. (gpl, program)
    breve program: a url shortener (mit, program)
    brians-brain program: A Haskell implementation of the Brian's Brain cellular automaton (bsd3, program)
    brillig library and program: Simple part of speech tagger (bsd3, library, program)
    buildbox-tools program: Tools for working with buildbox benchmark result files. (bsd3, program)
    buildwrapper library and program: A library and an executable that provide an easy API for a Haskell IDE (bsd3, library, program)
    bumper program: Automatically bump package versions, also transitively. (bsd3, program)
    bustle program: Draw sequence diagrams of D-Bus traffic (program)
    c0check program: Simple C0 Syntax Check (gpl, program)
    c2hs program: C->Haskell FFI tool that gives some cross-language type safety (gpl, program)
    c2hsc program: Convert C API header files to .hsc and .hsc.helper.c files (bsd3, program)
    cab library and program: A maintenance command of Haskell cabal packages (bsd3, library, program)
    cabal-audit program: Check how up-to-date your .cabal dependencies are. (mit, program)
    cabal-bounds library and program: A command line program for managing the bounds/versions of the dependencies in a cabal file. (bsd3, library, program)
    cabal-cargs library and program: A command line program for extracting compiler arguments from a cabal file. (bsd3, library, program)
    cabal-constraints program: Repeatable builds for cabalized Haskell projects. (mit, program)
    cabal-db program: query tools for the local cabal database (bsd3, program)
    cabal-debian library and program: Create a Debianization for a Cabal package (bsd3, library, program)
    cabal-dependency-licenses program: Compose a list of a project's transitive dependencies with their licenses (bsd3, program)
    cabal-dev programs: Manage sandboxed Haskell build environments (bsd3, deprecated, program)
    cabal-dir program: show dist dir of 'cabal copy/install' (bsd3, program)
    cabal-ghci library and program: Set up ghci with options taken from a .cabal file (bsd3, deprecated, library, program)
    cabal-graphdeps program: Generate graphs of install-time Cabal dependencies (mit, program)
    cabal-helper library and program: Simple interface to Cabal's configuration state used by ghc-mod (agpl, library, program)
    cabal-install program: The command-line interface for Cabal and Hackage. (bsd3, program)
    cabal-install-bundle program: The (bundled) command-line interface for Cabal and Hackage. (bsd3, program)
    cabal-install-ghc72 program: Temporary version of cabal-install for ghc-7.2 (bsd3, program)
    cabal-install-ghc74 program: Temporary version of cabal-install for ghc-7.4 (bsd3, program)
    cabal-macosx library and program: Cabal support for creating Mac OSX application bundles. (bsd3, library, program)
    cabal-meta library and program: build multiple packages at once (bsd3, library, program)
    cabal-mon program: A monitor for cabal builds (mit, program)
    cabal-nirvana program: Avoid Cabal dependency hell by constraining to known good versions. (deprecated) (bsd3, deprecated, program)
    cabal-progdeps program: Show dependencies of program being built in current directory (bsd3, program)
    cabal-rpm program: RPM packaging tool for Haskell Cabal-based packages (gpl, program)
    cabal-setup program: The user interface for building and installing Cabal packages (bsd3, program)
    cabal-sign program: Sign and verify Cabal packages. (bsd3, program)
    cabal-sort programs: Topologically sort cabal packages (bsd3, program)
    cabal-src programs: Alternative install procedure to avoid the diamond dependency issue. (bsd3, program)
    cabal-test program: Automated test tool for cabal projects. (bsd3, program)
    cabal-test-bin library and program: A program for finding temporary build file during cabal-test. (bsd3, library, program)
    cabal-uninstall program: Uninstall cabal packages (bsd3, program)
    cabal-upload program: Command-line tool for uploading packages to Hackage (bsd3, program)
    cabal2arch program: Create Arch Linux packages from Cabal packages. (bsd3, program)
    cabal2doap program: Cabal to Description-of-a-Project (DOAP) (bsd3, program)
    cabal2ebuild library and programs: make gentoo's .ebuild file from .cabal file (bsd3, library, program)
    cabal2ghci program: A tool to generate .ghci file from .cabal (bsd3, program)
    cabal2nix programs: Convert Cabal files into Nix build instructions (bsd3, deprecated, program)
    cabal2spec program: Generates RPM Spec files from cabal files (gpl, program)
    cabalQuery library and program: A simple tool to query cabal files. (bsd3, library, program)
    cabalg library and program: alias for cabal install from given git repo (library, mit, program)
    cabalgraph program: Generate pretty graphs of module trees from cabal files (bsd3, program)
    cabalmdvrpm library and program: Create mandriva rpm from cabal package (gpl, library, program)
    cabalrpmdeps library and programs: Autogenerate rpm dependencies from cabal files (gpl, library, program)
    cabalvchk program: Verify installed package version against user-specified constraints. (bsd3, program)
    cabin program: Cabal binary sandboxes. (bsd3, program)
    cairo-appbase program: A template for building new GUI applications using GTK and Cairo. (bsd3, program)
    cake library and program: A build-system library and driver (gpl, library, program)
    cake3 library and programs: Third cake the Makefile EDSL (bsd3, library, program)
    cakyrespa program: run turtle like LOGO with lojban (bsd3, program)
    cal3d-examples programs: Examples for the Cal3d animation library. (gpl, program)
    calc program: A small compiler for arithmetic expressions. (bsd3, program)
    calculator program: A calculator repl, with variables, functions & Mathematica like dynamic plots. (gpl, program)
    caldims library and program: Calculation tool and library supporting units (gpl, library, program)
    caledon program: a logic programming language based on the calculus of constructions (gpl, program)
    call-haskell-from-anything library and program: Python-to-Haskell function calls (library, mit, program)
    camh program: Image converter to 256-colored text. (bsd3, program)
    cantor program: Application for analysis of java source code (bsd3, program)
    cao program: CAO Compiler (gpl, program)
    cap program: Interprets and debug the cap language. (bsd3, program)
    capri program: A simple wrapper over cabal-install to operate in project-private mode. (bsd3, program)
    carboncopy program: Drop emails from threads being watched into special CC folder. (bsd3, program)
    carettah programs: A presentation tool written with Haskell. (gpl, program)
    castle program: A tool to manage shared cabal-install sandboxes. (apache, program)
    casui program: Equation Manipulator (mit, program)
    cblrepo program: Tool to maintain a database of CABAL packages and their dependencies (program)
    cedict library and program: Convenient Chinese phrase & character lookup. (gpl, library, program)
    cfipu program: cfipu processor for toy brainfuck-like language (bsd3, program)
    cfopu program: cfopu processor (bsd3, deprecated, program)
    cg program: Parser for categorial grammars. (gpl, program)
    cgen library and programs: generates Haskell bindings and C wrappers for C++ libraries (bsd3, library, program)
    cgrep program: Command line tool (gpl, program)
    change-monger library and program: Parse VCS changelogs into ChangeLogs (bsd3, library, program)
    charade library and program: Rapid prototyping websites with Snap and Heist (bsd3, library, program)
    chatter library and programs: A library of simple NLP algorithms. (bsd3, library, program)
    cheapskate library and program: Experimental markdown processor. (bsd3, library, program)
    check-pvp program: Check whether module and package imports conform to the PVP (bsd3, program)
    chunky library and program: Human-readable storage of text/binary objects. (deprecated, lgpl, library, program)
    citeproc-hs-pandoc-filter program: A Pandoc filter for processing bibliographic references with citeproc-hs (gpl, program)
    clac program: Simple CLI RPN calculator (gpl, program)
    clafer library and program: clafer compiles Clafer models to other formats, such as Alloy, XML, HTML, Dot. (library, mit, program)
    claferIG library and program: claferIG is an interactive tool that generates instances of Clafer models. (library, mit, program)
    clanki program: Command-line spaced-repetition software (mit, program)
    clash-ghc program: CAES Language for Synchronous Hardware (bsd2, program)
    clckwrks-cli program: a command-line interface for adminstrating some aspects of clckwrks (bsd3, program)
    clckwrks-dot-com program: clckwrks.com (bsd3, program)
    clean-home program: Keep your home dir clean by finding old conf files (bsd3, program)
    cless program: Colorized LESS (mit, program)
    clevercss library and program: A CSS preprocessor (bsd3, library, program)
    click-clack program: Toy game (tetris on billiard board). Hipmunk in action. (program)
    clientsession library and program: Securely store session data in a client-side cookie. (bsd3, library, program)
    clifford library and program: A Clifford algebra library (bsd3, library, program)
    clippings library and program: A parser/generator for Kindle-format clipping files (`My Clippings.txt`), (library, mit, program)
    clone-all program: Clone all github repositories from a given user (github, mit, program)
    cloudyfs program: A cloud in the file system. (program)
    cltw program: Command line Twitter utility (bsd3, program)
    clua program: C to Lua data wrapper generator (bsd3, program)
    clustertools programs: Tools for manipulating sequence clusters (gpl, program)
    cmathml3 library and program: Data model, parser, serialiser and transformations for Content MathML 3 (bsd3, library, program)
    cmdargs-browser program: Helper to enter cmdargs command lines using a web browser (bsd3, program)
    cmu library and program: Unification in a Commutative Monoid (gpl, library, program)
    cnc-spec-compiler program: Compiler/Translator for CnC Specification Files. (bsd3, program)
    codec-libevent library and program: Cross-platform structure serialisation (bsd3, deprecated, library, program)
    codecov-haskell library and programs: Codecov.io support for Haskell. (bsd3, library, program)
    codemonitor program: Tool that automatically runs arbitrary commands when files change on disk. (bsd3, program)
    codex library and program: A ctags file generator for cabal project dependencies. (apache, library, program)
    cognimeta-utils library and program: Utilities for Cognimeta products (such as perdure). API may change often. (library, program)
    coinbase-exchange library and program: Connector library for the coinbase exchange. (library, mit, program)
    colada library and program: Colada implements incremental word class class induction using online LDA (bsd3, library, program)
    collada-output library and program: Generate animated 3d objects in COLLADA (bsd3, library, program)
    collapse-util program: utility for collapsing adjacent writes (bsd3, program)
    colorize-haskell library and program: Highligt Haskell source (bsd3, library, program)
    combinator-interactive library and program: SKI Combinator interpreter (bsd3, library, program)
    concraft-hr library and program: Part-of-speech tagger for Croatian (bsd3, library, program)
    concraft-pl library and program: Morphological tagger for Polish (bsd3, library, program)
    concrete-relaxng-parser program: A parser driven by a standard RELAX NG schema with concrete syntax extensions. (gpl, program)
    concurrent-dns-cache library and program: Concurrent DNS cache (bsd3, library, program)
    condor library and program: Information retrieval library (bsd3, deprecated, library, program)
    config-select program: A small program for swapping out dot files. (gpl, program)
    confsolve program: A command line tool for resolving conflicts of file synchronizers. (bsd3, program)
    conjure library and program: A BitTorrent client (bsd3, library, program)
    conlogger library and program: A logger for a concurrent program. (library, log, mit, program)
    containers-benchmark program: Extensive benchmark suite for containers package. (bsd3, program)
    copilot library and program: A stream DSL for writing embedded C programs. (bsd3, library, program)
    copilot-c99 library and program: A compiler for Copilot targeting C99. (bsd3, library, program)
    core-haskell program: A subset of Haskell using in UCC for teaching purpose (bsd3, program)
    corebot-bliki library and program: A bliki written using yesod. Uses pandoc to process files stored in git. (bsd3, library, program)
    couch-hs library and program: A CouchDB view server for Haskell. (library, program, public-domain)
    court programs: Simple and flexible CI system (bsd3, program)
    cpphs library and program: A liberalised re-implementation of cpp, the C pre-processor. (lgpl, library, program)
    cpsa programs: Symbolic cryptographic protocol analyzer (bsd3, program)
    cpuperf program: Modify the cpu frequency on OpenBSD systems (bsd3, program)
    cqrs-example program: Example for cqrs package (mit, program)
    cr program: Code review tool (gpl, program)
    crackNum library and program: Crack various integer, floating-point data formats (bsd3, library, program)
    criterion-to-html program: Convert criterion output to HTML reports (bsd3, program)
    crocodile program: An offline renderer supporting ray tracing and photon mapping (gpl, program)
    crunghc program: A runghc replacement with transparent caching (program, public-domain)
    cryptol library and program: Cryptol: The Language of Cryptography (bsd3, library, program)
    cspmchecker programs: A command line type checker for CSPM files. (bsd3, program)
    csv-nptools programs: A collection of CSV tools (gpl, program)
    csv-to-qif program: A small program that will read csv files and create qif files (bsd3, program)
    cubical program: Implementation of Univalence in Cubical Sets (mit, program)
    cuboid program: 3D Yampa/GLUT Puzzle Game (mit, program)
    cuda library and program: FFI binding to the CUDA interface for programming NVIDIA GPUs (bsd3, library, program)
    curry-frontend library and program: Compile the functional logic language Curry to several intermediate formats (library, program)
    cursedcsv program: Terminal tool for viewing tabular data (bsd3, program)
    cv-combinators library and programs: Functional Combinators for Computer Vision (bsd3, library, program)
    daemons library and programs: Daemons in Haskell made fun and easy (gpl, library, program)
    dao library and program: Dao is meta programming language with its own built-in interpreted language, designed with artificial intelligence applications in mind. (gpl, library, program)
    dapi program: Prints a series of dates (bsd3, program)
    darcs-benchmark program: Comparative benchmark suite for darcs. (bsd3, program)
    darcs-buildpackage programs: Tools to help manage Debian packages with Darcs (gpl, program)
    darcs-cabalized program: David's Advanced Version Control System (deprecated, gpl, program)
    darcs-fastconvert program: Import/export git fast-import streams to/from darcs. (bsd3, program)
    darcs-graph program: Generate graphs of darcs repository activity (bsd3, program)
    darcs-monitor program: Darcs repository monitor (sends email) (gpl, program)
    darcs2dot program: Outputs dependencies of darcs patches in dot format. (bsd3, program)
    darcsden programs: Darcs repository UI and hosting/collaboration app (hub.darcs.net branch). (gpl, program)
    darcswatch programs: Track application of Darcs patches (gpl, program)
    darkplaces-demo library and program: Utility and parser for DarkPlaces demo files (gpl, library, program)
    darkplaces-rcon-util library and program: Darplaces rcon utility (gpl, library, program)
    dash-haskell program: Convert package Haddock to Dash docsets (IDE docs) (lgpl, program)
    data-structure-inferrer program: Program that infers the fastest data structure available for your program (mit, program)
    dataflow library and program: Generate Graphviz documents from a Haskell representation. (bsd3, library, program)
    datalog library and program: An implementation of datalog in Haskell (bsd3, library, program)
    datapacker program: Tool to help pack files into the minimum number of CDs/DVDs/etc (gpl, program)
    dbjava library and program: Decompiler Bytecode Java (bsd3, library, program)
    dbmigrations library and program: An implementation of relational database "migrations" (bsd3, library, program)
    ddc-tools programs: Disciplined Disciple Compiler command line tools. (mit, program)
    ddc-war program: Disciplined Disciple Compiler test driver and buildbot. (mit, program)
    ddci-core program: Disciple Core language interactive interpreter. (mit, program)
    debian library and programs: Modules for working with the Debian package system (bsd3, library, program)
    debian-binary library and programs: Utilities to work with debian binary packages (deprecated, library, program)
    debian-build library and program: Debian package build sequence tools (bsd3, library, program)
    decode-utf8 program: Decode a UTF-8 byte stream on standard input (mit, program)
    dedukti library and program: A type-checker for the -modulo calculus. (gpl, library, program)
    deeplearning-hs library and program: Deep Learning in Haskell (library, mit, program)
    deka-tests library and program: Tests for deka, decimal floating point arithmetic (bsd3, library, program)
    delta library and program: A library for detecting file changes (lgpl, library, program)
    delta-h library and program: Online entropy-based model of lexical category acquisition. (bsd3, library, program)
    denominate library and program: Functions supporting bulk file and directory name normalization. (bsd3, library, program)
    depends program: A simple configuration management tool for Haskell (deprecated, mit, program)
    dephd programs: Analyze quality of nucleotide sequences. (gpl, program)
    derive library and program: A program and library to derive instances for data types (bsd3, library, program)
    derive-gadt library and programs: Instance deriving for (a subset of) GADTs. (bsd3, library, program)
    detrospector program: Markov chain text generator (bsd3, program)
    deunicode program: Get rid of unicode (utf-8) symbols in Haskell sources (mit, program)
    devil program: A small tool to make it easier to update program managed by Angel. (mit, program)
    dfsbuild program: Build Debian From Scratch CD/DVD images (gpl, program)
    diagrams-haddock library and program: Preprocessor for embedding diagrams in Haddock documentation (bsd3, library, program)
    dice library and program: Simplistic D&D style dice-rolling system. (library, program, public-domain)
    dictparser library and program: Parsec parsers for the DICT format produced by dictfmt -t (bsd3, library, program)
    diffcabal program: Diff two .cabal files syntactically (bsd3, program)
    diffdump programs: Tools for diffing stdout (bsd3, program)
    dingo-example program: Dingo Example (mit, program)
    dist-upload library and program: Generate/Upload cabal package to Hackage. (gpl, library, program)
    diversity library and program: Return the diversity at each position for all sequences in a fasta file (gpl, library, program)
    djinn program: Generate Haskell code from a type (bsd3, program)
    dnscache library and program: Caching DNS resolver library and mass DNS resolver utility (bsd3, library, program)
    doc-review program: Document review Web application, like http://book.realworldhaskell.org/ (bsd3, program)
    doccheck program: Checks Haddock comments for pitfalls and version changes. (gpl, program)
    docidx program: Generate an HTML index of installed Haskell packages and their documentation. (bsd3, program)
    dockercook library and program: A build tool for multiple docker image layers (library, mit, program)
    doctest library and program: Test interactive Haskell examples (library, mit, program)
    doctest-discover library and program: Easy way to run doctests via cabal (library, program, public-domain)
    doctest-discover-configurator library and program: Easy way to run doctests via cabal (no aeson dependency, uses configurator instead) (deprecated, library, program, public-domain)
    dominion library and program: A simulator for the board game Dominion. (bsd3, library, program)
    dot2graphml program: Converter from GraphViz .dot format to yEd GraphML (bsd3, program)
    dotenv library and program: Loads environment variables from dotenv files (library, mit, program)
    dotfs library and program: Filesystem to manage and parse dotfiles (bsd3, library, program)
    dow program: Dungeons of Wor (bsd3, program)
    download-media-content program: Simple tool to download images from RSS feeds (e.g. Flickr, Picasa) (bsd3, program)
    dph-examples programs: Data Parallel Haskell example programs. (bsd3, program)
    dropsolve program: A command line tool for resolving dropbox conflicts. Deprecated! Please use confsolve. (bsd3, deprecated, program)
    dsh-sql library and program: SQL backend for Database Supported Haskell (DSH) (bsd3, library, program)
    dsmc-tools programs: DSMC toolkit for rarefied gas dynamics (bsd3, program)
    dtab library and program: Harmonix (Guitar Hero, Rock Band) DTA/DTB metadata library (gpl, library, program)
    duplo library and program: Frontend development build tool (deprecated, library, mit, program)
    dwarfadt library and programs: High-level wrapper around the dwarf library (bsd3, library, program)
    ecma262 library and program: A ECMA-262 interpreter library (bsd2, interpreter, javascript, library, program)
    ecu programs: Tools for automotive ECU development. (bsd3, program)
    eddie program: Command line file filtering with haskell (bsd3, program)
    edentv program: A Tool to Visualize Parallel Functional Program Executions (gpl, program)
    edge program: Top view space combat arcade game (gpl, program)
    edit-lenses-demo program: Programs demoing the use of symmetric, stateful edit lenses (bsd3, program)
    editor-open library and programs: Open the user's $VISUAL or $EDITOR for text input. (apache, library, program)
    egison library and program: Programming language with non-linear pattern-matching against unfree data (library, mit, program)
    egison-tutorial program: A tutorial program for the Egison programming language (mit, program)
    ehaskell program: like eruby, ehaskell is embedded haskell. (gpl, program)
    elerea-examples programs: Example applications for Elerea (bsd3, program)
    elm-compiler library and programs: Values to help with elm-package, elm-make, and elm-lang.org. (bsd3, library, program)
    elm-get library and program: Tool for sharing and using Elm libraries (bsd3, deprecated, library, program)
    elm-init program: Set up basic structure for an elm project (mit, program)
    elm-make program: A build tool for Elm projects (bsd3, program)
    elm-package library and program: Package manager for Elm libraries (bsd3, library, program)
    elm-reactor program: Interactive development tool for Elm programs (bsd3, program)
    elm-repl program: a REPL for Elm (bsd3, program)
    elm-server program: Server for developing Elm projects (bsd3, deprecated, program)
    elocrypt library and program: Generate easy-to-remember, hard-to-guess passwords (library, program)
    email-validator program: Perform basic syntax and deliverability checks on email addresses. (gpl, program)
    embeddock library and program: Embed the values in scope in the haddock documentation of the module (bsd3, library, program)
    embroidery library and program: support for embroidery formats in haskell (gpl, library, program)
    epic library and program: Compiler for a simple functional language (bsd3, library, program)
    epub library and program: EPUB E-Book construction support library (bsd3, deprecated, library, program)
    epub-tools programs: Command line utilities for working with epub files (bsd3, program)
    epubname program: Rename epub ebook files based on meta information (bsd3, deprecated, program)
    equal-files program: Shell command for finding equal files (gpl, program)
    erd program: An entity-relationship diagram generator from a plain text description. (program, public-domain)
    eros-client program: DEPRECATED in favor of eros-http (bsd3, program)
    eros-http program: JSON HTTP interface to Eros. (bsd3, program)
    ert library and program: Easy Runtime Templates (gpl, library, program)
    esotericbot library and program: Esotericbot is a sophisticated, lightweight IRC bot. (bsd3, library, program)
    estreps programs: Repeats from ESTs (gpl, program)
    ethereum-client-haskell programs: A Haskell version of an Ethereum client (bsd3, program)
    ety library and program: Random etymology online entry. (bsd3, library, program)
    ewe program: An language using in Programming Languages teaching (bsd3, program)
    executable-hash library and program: Provides the SHA1 hash of the program executable (library, mit, program)
    exherbo-cabal program: Exheres generator for cabal packages (gpl, program)
    explain program: Show how expressions are parsed (mit, program)
    explore program: Experimental Plot data Reconstructor (bsd3, program)
    extemp program: automated printing for extemp speakers (bsd3, program)
    extractelf program: Extract an ELF's metadata and sections into files (bsd3, program)
    factory library and program: Rational arithmetic in an irrational world. (gpl, library, program)
    falling-turnip program: Falling sand game/cellular automata simulation using regular parallel arrays. (bsd3, program)
    fallingblocks program: A fun falling blocks game. (gpl, program)
    fast-tags library and program: Fast incremental vi and emacs tags. (bsd3, library, program)
    fay library and program: A compiler for Fay, a Haskell subset that compiles to JavaScript. (bsd3, library, program)
    fcd library and program: A faster way to navigate directories using the command line. (library, mit, program)
    fdo-trash library and program: Utilities related to freedesktop Trash standard. (bsd3, library, program)
    feed-cli program: A simple command line interface for creating and updating feeds like RSS (bsd3, program)
    feed2lj program: (unsupported) (bsd3, deprecated, program)
    feed2twitter library and program: Send posts from a feed to Twitter (bsd3, library, program)
    fen2s library and program: Converting a chess position from FEN notation to text (library, mit, program)
    fenfire programs: Graph-based notetaking system (gpl, program)
    ffeed library and programs: Haskell binding to the FriendFeed API (bsd3, library, program)
    ffmpeg-tutorials programs: Tutorials on ffmpeg usage to play video/audio (bsd3, program)
    fibon programs: Tools for running and analyzing Haskell benchmarks (bsd3, program)
    find-conduit library and program: A file-finding conduit that allows user control over traversals. (library, mit, program)
    firstify library and program: Defunctionalisation for Yhc Core (bsd3, library, program)
    fishfood program: Calculates file-size frequency-distribution. (gpl, program)
    fix-imports program: Program to manage the imports of a haskell module (bsd3, program)
    fixedwidth-hs library and program: Quick parsing of fixed-width data formats. (library, mit, program)
    fixhs library and program: FIX (co)parser (lgpl, library, program)
    flaccuraterip program: Verify FLAC files ripped form CD using AccurateRip (gpl, program)
    flamingra library and program: FlameGraphs of profiling (bsd3, library, program)
    flexible-unlit library and program: A configurable reimplementation of unlit (bsd3, library, program)
    flickr library and programs: Haskell binding to the Flickr API (bsd3, library, program)
    flo library and program: Generate flow charts from your code base. (bsd3, library, program)
    flow2dot library and program: Library and binary to generate sequence/flow diagrams from plain text source (bsd3, library, program)
    flowdock-api library and program: API integration with Flowdock. (library, mit, program)
    flower programs: Analyze 454 flowgrams (.SFF files) (gpl, program)
    flowsim programs: Simulate 454 pyrosequencing (gpl, program)
    fltkhs library and programs: FLTK bindings (library, mit, program)
    fmark program: A Friendly Markup language without syntax. (bsd3, program)
    follower program: Follow Tweets anonymously (gpl, program)
    font-opengl-basic4x6 library and program: Basic4x6 font for OpenGL (library, program, public-domain)
    foo program: Paper soccer, an OpenGL game. (gpl, program)
    fordo program: Run a command on files with magic substituion support (sequencing and regexp) (gpl, program)
    forger library and program: Library for generating fake placeholder data (bsd3, library, program)
    formal program: A statically typed, functional programming language (mit, program)
    format-status program: A utility for writing the date to dzen2. (mit, program)
    forml program: A statically typed, functional programming language (mit, program)
    fptest programs: IEEE754r floating point conformance tests (bsd3, program)
    fquery program: Installed package query tool for Gentoo Linux (program)
    fractal program: Draw Newton, Julia and Mandelbrot fractals (bsd3, program)
    frag program: A 3-D First Person Shooter Game (gpl, program)
    frame library and program: A simple web framework. (bsd3, library, program)
    free-theorems-counterexamples library and program: Automatically Generating Counterexamples to Naive Free Theorems (library, program, public-domain)
    free-theorems-seq-webui program: Taming Selective Strictness (program, public-domain)
    free-theorems-webui programs: CGI-based web interface for the free-theorems package. (program, public-domain)
    freekick2 programs: A soccer game (gpl, program)
    freesect program: A Haskell syntax extension for generalised sections (bsd3, program)
    freesound library and program: Access the Freesound Project database (bsd3, library, program)
    frquotes library and program: Lexical extension for Quasi-Quotations using French-Quotes (bsd3, library, program)
    fst library and program: Finite state transducers (bsd3, library, program)
    fswatcher program: Watch a file/directory and run a command when it's modified (bsd3, program)
    ftshell program: Shell interface to the FreeTheorems library. (program, public-domain)
    fullstop library and program: Simple sentence segmenter (bsd3, library, program)
    funion program: A unioning file-system using HFuse (bsd3, program)
    funsat library and program: A modern DPLL-style SAT solver (bsd3, library, program)
    futun program: Simple IP-over-UDP tunnel using TUNTAP (gpl, program)
    fuzzytime library and program: A 'ten past six' style clock (gpl, library, program)
    g-npm program: Generate Gentoo ebuilds from NodeJS/npm packages. (mit, program)
    gact program: General Alignment Clustering Tool (gpl, program)
    gameclock program: Game clock that shows two analog clock faces (gpl, program)
    garepinoh library and programs: reverse prefix notation calculator and calculation library (library, program, public-domain)
    gearbox program: zooming rotating fractal gears graphics demo (gpl, program)
    geek-server library and program: Geek blog engine server (gpl, library, program)
    gender library and program: Identify a persons gender by their first name (lgpl, library, program)
    genetics program: A Genetic Algorithm library (bsd3, program)
    geni-gui library and program: GenI graphical user interface (gpl, library, program)
    geni-util library and program: Companion tools for use with the GenI surface realiser (gpl, library, program)
    geniconvert program: Conversion utility for the GenI generator (gpl, program)
    geniserver library and program: Simple HTTP server for GenI results (gpl, library, program)
    getemx program: Fetch from emusic using .emx files (bsd3, program)
    gf library and program: Grammatical Framework (library, program)
    ggtsTC program: A type checker and runtime system of rCOS/g (impl. of ggts-FCS). (gpl, program)
    ghc-core program: Display GHC's core and assembly output in a pager (bsd3, program)
    ghc-core-html program: Core to HTML display (bsd3, program)
    ghc-events library and program: Library and tool for parsing .eventlog files from GHC (bsd3, library, program)
    ghc-events-analyze program: Analyze and visualize event logs (bsd3, program)
    ghc-events-parallel library and program: Library and tool for parsing .eventlog files from parallel GHC (bsd3, library, program)
    ghc-gc-tune program: Graph performance of Haskell programs with different GC flags (bsd3, program)
    ghc-imported-from library and programs: Find the Haddock documentation for a symbol. (bsd3, library, program)
    ghc-make program: Accelerated version of ghc --make (bsd3, program)
    ghc-man-completion program: Generate a bash completion from the GHC manpage (bsd3, program)
    ghc-mod library and programs: Happy Haskell Programming (bsd3, library, program)
    ghc-parmake library and program: A parallel wrapper for 'ghc --make'. (bsd3, library, program)
    ghc-pkg-autofix program: Simple utility to fix BROKEN package dependencies for cabal-install. (bsd3, program)
    ghc-prof-flamegraph library and program: Generates data to be used with flamegraph.pl from .prof files. (library, mit, program)
    ghci-haskeline program: An implementation of ghci using the Haskeline line-input library. (bsd3, program)
    ghci-ng program: Extended GHCi fork (bsd3, program)
    ghcid library and program: GHCi based bare bones IDE (bsd3, library, program)
    ghcjs-dom-hello program: GHCJS DOM Hello World, an example package (mit, program)
    ghclive library and program: Interactive Haskell interpreter in a browser. (bsd3, library, program)
    ghczdecode program: Decode Z-encoded strings from GHC (bsd3, program)
    ght library and program: Trivial routines for inspecting git repositories (gpl, library, program)
    ginsu program: Ginsu Gale Client (mit, program)
    gipeda program: Git Performance Dashboard (mit, program)
    gist program: A reliable command-line client for gist.github.com (gpl, program)
    git-all program: Determine which Git repositories need actions to be taken (bsd3, program)
    git-annex program: manage files with git, without checking their contents into git (gpl, program)
    git-checklist program: Maintain per-branch checklists in Git (gpl, program)
    git-freq program: A Git subcommand to show total addition, deletion per file (bsd3, git, program)
    git-gpush program: More intelligent push-to-GitHub utility. (bsd3, program)
    git-monitor program: Passively snapshots working tree changes efficiently. (bsd3, program)
    git-repair program: repairs a damanged git repisitory (gpl, program)
    git-sanity library and program: A sanity checker for your git history. (apache, library, program)
    git-vogue library and programs: A framework for pre-commit checks. (bsd3, library, program)
    gitcache program: Simple git utility to use and manage clone cache (bsd3, program)
    gitdo program: Create Github issues out of TODO comments in code (mit, program)
    github-backup programs: backs up everything github knows about a repository, to the repository (gpl, program)
    gitignore program: Apply GitHub .gitignore templates to already existing repositories. (bsd3, program)
    gitit library and programs: Wiki using happstack, git or darcs, and pandoc. (gpl, library, program)
    glambda library and program: A simply typed lambda calculus interpreter, written with GADTs (bsd3, library, program)
    glapp library and program: An OpenGL micro framework. (gpl, library, program)
    glintcollider program: A simple ray tracer in an early stage of development. (bsd3, program)
    glome-hs library and program: ray tracer (gpl, library, program)
    gloss-examples programs: Examples using the gloss library (mit, program)
    gloss-juicy library and program: Load any image supported by Juicy.Pixels in your gloss application (bsd3, library, program)
    glue library and program: Make better services. (bsd3, library, program)
    gmndl program: Mandelbrot Set explorer using GTK (gpl, program)
    gnome-desktop program: Randomly set a picture as the GNOME desktop background (gpl, program)
    goatee-gtk library and program: A monadic take on a 2,500-year-old board game - GTK+ UI. (agpl, library, program)
    google-html5-slide program: Google HTML5 Slide generator (bsd3, program)
    gopherbot program: Spidering robot to download files from Gopherspace (gpl, program)
    gpah program: Generic Programming Use in Hackage (bsd3, program)
    gps2htmlReport library and program: GPS to HTML Summary Report (bsd3, library, program)
    graph-rewriting-cl program: Interactive graph rewriting system implementing various well-known combinators (bsd3, deprecated, program)
    graph-rewriting-lambdascope program: Lambdascope, an optimal evaluator of the lambda calculus, as an interactive graph-rewriting system (bsd3, program)
    graph-rewriting-ski programs: Two evalutors of the SKI combinator calculus as interactive graph rewrite systems (bsd3, program)
    graph-rewriting-trs program: Evaluate first-order applicative term rewrite systems interactively using graph reduction (bsd3, program)
    graph-rewriting-ww program: Evaluator of the lambda-calculus in an interactive graph rewriting system with explicit sharing (bsd3, program)
    graphicstools library and program: Tools for creating graphical UIs, based on wxHaskell. (bsd3, library, program)
    graphmod program: Present the module dependencies of a program as a "dot" graph. (bsd3, program)
    graphtype program: A simple tool to illustrate dependencies between Haskell types (bsd3, program)
    greencard library and program: GreenCard, a foreign function pre-processor for Haskell. (bsd3, library, program)
    grm library and program: grm grammar converter (bsd3, library, program)
    groundhog-inspector library and program: Type-safe datatype-database mapping library. (bsd3, library, program)
    gruff library and program: fractal explorer GUI using the ruff library (gpl, library, program)
    gruff-examples programs: Mandelbrot Set examples using ruff and gruff (gpl, program)
    gsmenu program: A visual generic menu (bsd3, program)
    gt-tools program: Console and GUI interface for Google Translate service (gpl, program)
    gtk2hs-buildtools programs: Tools to build the Gtk2Hs suite of User Interface libraries. (gpl, program)
    gtk2hs-hello program: Gtk2Hs Hello World, an example package (mit, program)
    gtkrsync programs: Gnome rsync progress display (gpl, program)
    gulcii program: graphical untyped lambda calculus interactive interpreter (gpl, program)
    gyah-bin program: A binary version of GiveYouAHead (mit, program)
    h-booru library and program: Haskell library for retrieving data from various booru image sites (gpl, library, program)
    hLLVM library and program: A library for analyzing and transforming LLVM (3.5) assembly codes (bsd3, library, program)
    hPDB-examples programs: Examples for hPDB library (bsd3, program)
    hS3 library and program: Interface to Amazon's Simple Storage Service (S3) (bsd3, library, program)
    hVOIDP library and program: Optimal variable selection in chain graphical model. (gpl, library, program)
    hXmixer program: A Gtk mixer GUI application for FreeBSD (bsd3, program)
    hackage-diff program: Compare the public API of different versions of a Hackage library (mit, program)
    hackage-mirror library and program: Simple mirroring utility for Hackage (library, mit, program)
    hackage-plot program: Generate cumulative graphs of hackage uploads (bsd3, program)
    hackage-proxy program: Provide a proxy for Hackage which modifies responses in some way. (deprecated) (deprecated, mit, program)
    hackage-sparks program: Generate sparkline graphs of hackage statistics (bsd3, program)
    hackage2hwn program: Convert Hackage RSS feeds to wiki format for publishing on Haskell.org (bsd3, program)
    hackage2twitter program: Send new Hackage releases to Twitter (bsd3, program)
    hackager program: Hackage testing tool (bsd3, program)
    hackertyper program: "Hack" like a programmer in movies and games! (mit, program)
    hackport program: Hackage and Portage integration tool (gpl, program)
    haddock program: A documentation-generation tool for Haskell libraries (bsd3, program)
    haddock-leksah program: A documentation-generation tool for Haskell libraries (bsd3, deprecated, program)
    haddocset program: Generate docset of Dash by Haddock haskell documentation tool (bsd3, program)
    hadoop-tools program: Fast command line tools for working with Hadoop. (apache, program)
    haeredes program: Confirm delegation of NS and MX records. (gpl, program)
    haggis library and program: A static site generator with blogging/comments support (library, mit, program)
    haha library and program: A simple library for creating animated ascii art on ANSI terminals. (bsd3, library, program)
    hailgun-send program: A program to send emails throught the Mailgun api. (mit, program)
    hails library and program: Multi-app web platform framework (library, mit, program)
    hails-bin program: Dynamic launcher of Hails applications (deprecated, gpl, program)
    hairy library and program: A JSON REST API (library, mit, program)
    hake library and program: make tool. ruby : rake = haskell : hake (gpl, library, program)
    hakyll library and program: A static website compiler library (bsd3, library, program)
    hakyll-contrib library and program: Extra modules for the hakyll website compiler (bsd3, library, program)
    hakyll-convert library and programs: Convert from other blog engines to Hakyll. (bsd3, library, program)
    halberd library and program: A tool to generate missing import statements for Haskell modules. (bsd3, library, program)
    halfs library and program: The HAskelL File System ("halfs" -- intended for use on the HaLVM) (bsd3, library, program)
    halive library and program: A live recompiler (bsd2, library, program)
    halma library and program: Library implementing Halma rules (library, mit, program)
    haltavista program: looks for functions given a set of example input/outputs (gpl, program)
    hampp program: Haskell macro preprocessor (program, public-domain)
    hamusic library and programs: Library to handle abstract music (bsd3, library, program)
    handa-gdata library and program: Library and command-line utility for accessing Google services and APIs. (library, mit, program)
    handa-geodata library and programs: Geographic and Geometric Data (library, mit, program)
    hangman program: Hangman implementation in Haskell written in two hours. (mit, program)
    hannahci program: Simple Continuous Integration/Deployment System (agpl, program)
    hans library and program: IPv4 Network Stack (bsd3, library, program)
    hapistrano library and program: A deployment library for Haskell applications (library, mit, program)
    happraise program: A small program for counting the comments in haskell source (bsd3, program)
    happs-tutorial program: A Happstack Tutorial that is its own web 2.0-type demo. (bsd3, program)
    happy program: Happy is a parser generator for Haskell (bsd3, program)
    harchive programs: Networked content addressed backup and restore software. (gpl, program)
    hark program: A Gentoo package query tool. (gpl, program)
    haroonga-httpd program: Yet another Groonga http server. (lgpl, program)
    hascal library and program: A minimalistic but extensible and precise calculator (gpl, library, program)
    hascat program: Hascat Web Server (program)
    hascat-setup library and program: Hascat Installation helper (library, program)
    hask-home programs: Generate homepages for cabal packages (bsd3, program)
    haskades program: Utility to generate bindings for BlackBerry Cascades (program)
    haskanoid program: A breakout game written in Yampa using SDL (program)
    haskarrow program: A dialect of haskell with order of execution based on dependency resolution (gpl, program)
    haskdeep program: Computes and audits file hashes. (bsd3, program)
    haskdogs program: Generate ctags file for haskell project directory and it's deps (bsd3, program)
    haskeem program: A small scheme interpreter (gpl, program)
    haskell-awk library and program: Transform text from the command-line using Haskell expressions. (apache, library, program)
    haskell-brainfuck library and program: BrainFuck interpreter (brainfuck, library, mit, program)
    haskell-cnc library and program: Library for parallel programming in the Intel Concurrent Collections paradigm. (bsd3, library, program)
    haskell-compression library and program: (bsd3, library, program)
    haskell-docs library and program: A program to find and display the docs and type of a name (bsd3, library, program)
    haskell-formatter library and program: Haskell source code formatter (gpl, library, program)
    haskell-ftp library and program: A Haskell ftp server with configurable backend. (bsd3, library, program)
    haskell-in-space programs: 'Asteroids' arcade games. (bsd3, program)
    haskell-pdf-presenter program: Tool for presenting PDF-based presentations. (gpl, program)
    haskell-platform-test program: A test system for the Haskell Platform environment (bsd3, program)
    haskell-updater program: Rebuild Haskell dependencies in Gentoo (gpl, program)
    haskelldb-dynamic library and program: HaskellDB support for the dynamically loaded drivers. (bsd3, library, program)
    haskelldb-flat library and program: An experimental HaskellDB back-end in pure Haskell (no SQL) (bsd3, library, program)
    haskelldb-hdbc-mysql library and program: HaskellDB support for the HDBC MySQL driver. (bsd3, library, program)
    haskelldb-hdbc-odbc library and program: HaskellDB support for the HDBC ODBC driver. (bsd3, library, program)
    haskelldb-hdbc-postgresql library and program: HaskellDB support for the HDBC PostgreSQL driver. (bsd3, library, program)
    haskelldb-hdbc-sqlite3 library and program: HaskellDB support for the HDBC SQLite driver. (bsd3, library, program)
    haskelldb-hsql-mysql library and program: HaskellDB support for the HSQL MySQL driver. (bsd3, library, program)
    haskelldb-hsql-odbc library and program: HaskellDB support for the HSQL ODBC driver. (bsd3, library, program)
    haskelldb-hsql-oracle library and program: HaskellDB support for the HSQL Oracle driver. (bsd3, library, program)
    haskelldb-hsql-postgresql library and program: HaskellDB support for the HSQL PostgreSQL driver. (bsd3, library, program)
    haskelldb-hsql-sqlite library and program: HaskellDB support for the HSQL SQLite driver. (bsd3, library, program)
    haskelldb-hsql-sqlite3 library and program: HaskellDB support for the HSQL SQLite3 driver. (bsd3, library, program)
    haskellscript program: Command line tool for running Haskell scripts with a hashbang. (bsd3, program)
    haskelm library and program: Elm to Haskell translation (bsd3, library, program)
    haskintex library and program: Haskell Evaluation inside of LaTeX code. (bsd3, library, program)
    haskoin-wallet library and program: Implementation of a Bitcoin hierarchical deterministric wallet (BIP32). (library, program, public-domain)
    haskore library and program: The Haskore Computer Music System (gpl, library, program)
    haskore-supercollider library and program: Haskore back-end for SuperCollider (gpl, library, program)
    hasktags library and program: Produces ctags "tags" and etags "TAGS" files for Haskell programs (bsd3, library, program)
    haslo library and programs: Loan calculator engine. (bsd3, library, program)
    hasloGUI program: Loan calculator Gtk GUI. Based on haslo (Haskell Loan) library. (bsd3, program)
    hastache library and program: Haskell implementation of Mustache templates (bsd3, library, program)
    haste program: A universal pastebin tool, written in Haskell. (bsd3, program)
    hat library and programs: The Haskell tracer, generating and viewing Haskell execution traces (library, program)
    hath program: Hath manipulates network blocks in CIDR notation. (gpl, program)
    hatt library and program: A truth table generator for classical propositional logic. (bsd3, library, program)
    haverer library and program: Implementation of the rules of Love Letter (apache, library, program)
    hawitter program: A twitter client for GTK+. Beta version. (bsd3, program)
    haxparse library and program: Readable HaxBall replays (library, mit, program)
    hayland library and program: Haskell bindings for the C Wayland library. (library, mit, program)
    hayoo-cli program: Hayoo CLI (mit, program)
    hback program: N-back memory game (bsd3, program)
    hbb program: Haskell Busy Bee, a backend for text editors. (lgpl, program)
    hbeat program: A simple step sequencer GUI. (bsd3, program)
    hbro library and program: Minimal extensible web-browser (library, program)
    hburg program: Haskell Bottom Up Rewrite Generator (bsd3, program)
    hcc program: A toy C compiler. (bsd3, program)
    hcube library and program: Virtual Rubik's cube of arbitrary size. (bsd3, library, program)
    hdevtools program: Persistent GHC powered background server for FAST haskell development tools (mit, program)
    hdirect library and program: An IDL compiler for Haskell (bsd3, library, program)
    hdm program: a small display manager. (gpl, program)
    hdocs library and program: Haskell docs tool (bsd3, library, program)
    hdph library and programs: Haskell distributed parallel Haskell (bsd3, library, program)
    heapsort library and program: Heapsort of MArrays as a demo of imperative programming (bsd3, library, program)
    hein program: An extensible build helper for haskell, in the vein of leiningen. (apache, program)
    helisp program: An incomplete Elisp compiler (bsd3, program)
    helium library and programs: The Helium Compiler. (gpl, library, program)
    hell library and program: A Haskell shell based on shell-conduit (bsd3, library, program)
    hellage programs: Distributed hackage mirror (bsd3, program)
    hellnet library and programs: Simple, distributed, anonymous data sharing network. (gpl, library, program)
    hello program: Hello World, an example package (bsd3, program)
    hemkay program: A module music mixer and player (bsd3, program)
    hemokit library and programs: Haskell port of the Emokit EEG project (library, mit, program)
    herbalizer program: HAML to ERB translator (mit, program)
    hermit library and program: Haskell Equational Reasoning Model-to-Implementation Tunnel (bsd3, library, program)
    hesql program: Haskell's embedded SQL (gpl, program)
    hetris program: Text Tetris (gpl, program)
    hevolisa program: Genetic Mona Lisa problem in Haskell (bsd3, program)
    hevolisa-dph program: Genetic Mona Lisa problem in Haskell - using Data Parallel Haskell (bsd3, program)
    hfd program: Flash debugger (bsd3, program)
    hfiar library and program: Four in a Row in Haskell!! (bsd3, library, program)
    hfractal program: OpenGL fractal renderer (bsd3, program)
    hg-buildpackage programs: Tools to help manage Debian packages with Mercurial (gpl, program)
    hgen program: Random generation of modal and hybrid logic formulas (gpl, program)
    hgettext library and program: Bindings to libintl.h (gettext, bindtextdomain) (bsd3, library, program)
    hgithub library and program: Haskell bindings to the GitHub API (bsd3, library, program)
    hgl-example program: Various animations generated using HGL (gpl, program)
    hgom program: An haskell port of the java version of gom (gpl, program)
    hi library and program: Generate scaffold for cabal project (bsd3, library, program)
    hiccup program: Relatively efficient Tcl interpreter with support for basic operations (gpl, program)
    hichi program: haskell robot for IChat protocol (gpl, program)
    highWaterMark program: Memory usage statistics (deprecated, gpl, program)
    highlight-versions program: Highlight package versions which differ from the latest version on Hackage (bsd3, program)
    hills program: Generate STL models from SRTM elevation data. (bsd3, program)
    himerge program: Haskell Graphical User Interface for Emerge (gpl, program)
    himg library and program: Simple gtk2hs image viewer. Point it at an image and fire away. (gpl, library, program)
    himpy program: multithreaded snmp poller for riemann (mit, program)
    hindent library and programs: Extensible Haskell pretty printer (bsd3, library, program)
    hinvaders program: Space Invaders (gpl, program)
    hips program: an IPS patcher (bsd3, program)
    hircules program: IRC client (gpl, program)
    hirt program: Calculates IRT 2PL and 3PL models (bsd3, program)
    hist-pl library and program: Umbrella package for the historical dictionary of Polish (bsd3, library, program)
    historian program: Extract the interesting bits from shell history (bsd3, program)
    hjs library and program: JavaScript Parser (bsd3, library, program)
    hjsmin library and program: Haskell implementation of a javascript minifier (bsd3, library, program)
    hlcm library and programs: Fast algorithm for mining closed frequent itemsets (bsd3, library, program)
    hledger library and program: The main command-line interface for the hledger accounting tool. (gpl, library, program)
    hledger-chart program: A pie chart image generator for the hledger accounting tool. (deprecated, gpl, program)
    hledger-diff program: Compares the transactions in two ledger files. (gpl, program)
    hledger-interest program: computes interest for a given account (bsd3, program)
    hledger-irr program: computes the internal rate of return of an investment (bsd3, program)
    hledger-vty program: A curses-style console interface for the hledger accounting tool. (deprecated, gpl, program)
    hlint library and program: Source code suggestions (bsd3, library, program)
    hlongurl library and program: Library and utility interfacing to longurl.org (bsd3, library, program)
    hmark library and program: A tool and library for Markov chains based text generation. (bsd3, library, program)
    hmatrix-svdlibc library and program: SVDLIBC bindings for HMatrix (bsd3, library, program)
    hmeap-utils programs: Haskell Meapsoft Parser Utilities (gpl, program)
    hmk library and program: A make alternative based on Plan9's mk. (gpl, library, program)
    hmp3 program: An ncurses mp3 player written in Haskell (gpl, program)
    hmumps program: Interpreter for the MUMPS langugae (gpl, program)
    hnetcdf library and programs: Haskell NetCDF library (bsd3, library, program)
    hnop program: (all-rights-reserved, program)
    hob library and program: A source code editor aiming for the convenience of use (gpl, library, program)
    hobbes program: A small file watcher for OSX (bsd3, program)
    hoe program: hoe: Haskell One-liner Evaluator (bsd3, program)
    hog program: Simple IRC logger bot. (bsd3, program)
    hogg library and programs: Library and tools to manipulate the Ogg container format (bsd3, library, program)
    hogre-examples programs: Examples for using Hogre. (mit, program)
    hois library and program: OIS bindings (bsd3, library, program)
    holy-project library and programs: Start your Haskell project with cabal, git and tests. (library, mit, program)
    homplexity program: Haskell code quality tool (bsd3, program)
    hoobuddy program: Simple tool for fetching and merging hoogle data (mit, program)
    hoodie program: A small, toy roguelike (gpl, program)
    hoodle library and program: Executable for hoodle (gpl, library, program)
    hoodle-extra programs: extra hoodle tools (gpl, program)
    hoodle-publish library and program: publish hoodle files as a static web site (bsd3, library, program)
    hoogle library and program: Haskell API Search (bsd3, library, program)
    hoogle-index program: Easily generate Hoogle indices for installed packages (bsd3, program)
    hoovie program: Haskell Media Server (bsd3, program)
    hopenpgp-tools programs: hOpenPGP-based command-line tools (program)
    hopfield library and programs: Hopfield Networks, Boltzmann Machines and Clusters (library, mit, program)
    hopfield-networks library and program: Hopfield Networks for unsupervised learning in Haskell (library, mit, program)
    hoq program: A language based on homotopy type theory with an interval type (gpl, program)
    hosc-utils programs: Haskell Open Sound Control Utilities (gpl, program)
    hosts-server program: An dns server which is extremely easy to config. (gpl, program)
    hothasktags program: Generates ctags for Haskell, incorporating import lists and qualified imports (bsd3, program)
    hp2any-graph program: Real-time heap graphing utility and profile stream server with a reusable graphing module. (bsd3, program)
    hp2any-manager program: A utility to visualise and compare heap profiles. (bsd3, program)
    hp2html program: A tool for converting GHC heap-profiles to HTML. (bsd3, program)
    hp2pretty program: generate pretty graphs from heap profiles (bsd3, program)
    hpack program: An alternative format for Haskell packages (mit, program)
    hpaco program: Modular template compiler (bsd3, program)
    hpage program: A scrapbook for Haskell developers (bsd3, program)
    hpaste program: Haskell paste web site. (gpl, program)
    hpasteit program: A command-line client for hpaste.org (bsd3, program)
    hpc-coveralls library and programs: Coveralls.io support for Haskell. (bsd3, library, program)
    hpc-tracer program: Tracer with AJAX interface (bsd3, program)
    hplaylist program: Application for managing playlist files on a music player (gpl, program)
    hpodder program: Podcast Aggregator (downloader) (gpl, program)
    hprotoc library and program: Parse Google Protocol Buffer specifications (bsd3, library, program)
    hprotoc-fork library and program: Parse Google Protocol Buffer specifications (bsd3, library, program)
    hps-cairo library and programs: Cairo rendering for the haskell postscript library (gpl, library, program)
    hpylos program: AI of Pylos game with GLUT interface. (gpl, program)
    hpyrg program: pyrg utility done right (mit, program)
    hranker program: Basic utility for ranking a list of items (bsd3, program)
    hricket program: A Cricket scoring application. (bsd3, program)
    hs-carbon-examples programs: Example Monte Carlo simulations implemented with Carbon (mit, program)
    hs-gen-iface program: Utility to generate haskell-names interface files (mit, program)
    hs-logo program: Logo interpreter written in Haskell (bsd3, program)
    hs-mesos library and programs: (library, mit, program)
    hs-nombre-generator program: Name generator. (mit, program)
    hs-pgms library and program: Programmer's Mine Sweeper in Haskell (bsd3, library, program)
    hs-twitterarchiver program: Commandline Twitter feed archiver (gpl, program)
    hs2048 library and program: A 2048 clone in Haskell. (library, mit, program)
    hs2bf program: Haskell to Brainfuck compiler (bsd3, program)
    hs2dot program: Generate graphviz-code from Haskell-code. (program)
    hsay program: (ab)Use Google Translate as a speech synthesiser (gpl, program)
    hsb2hs program: Preprocesses a file, adding blobs from files as string literals. (bsd3, program)
    hsbackup program: simple utility for rolling filesystem backups (bsd3, program)
    hsbencher-fusion library and programs: Backend for uploading benchmark data to Google Fusion Tables. (bsd3, library, program)
    hsc2hs program: A preprocessor that helps with writing Haskell bindings to C code (bsd3, program)
    hsc3-forth program: FORTH SUPERCOLLIDER (gpl, program)
    hsc3-graphs library and program: Haskell SuperCollider Graphs (gpl, library, program)
    hsc3-lisp program: LISP SUPERCOLLIDER (gpl, program)
    hsc3-utils library and programs: Haskell SuperCollider Utilities (gpl, library, program)
    hscd library and program: Command line client and library for SoundCloud.com (bsd3, library, program)
    hsclock program: An elegant analog clock using Haskell, GTK and Cairo (gpl, program)
    hscolour library and program: Colourise Haskell code. (gpl, library, program)
    hscope program: cscope like browser for Haskell code (bsd3, program)
    hscrtmpl program: Haskell shell script template (bsd3, program)
    hscurses-fish-ex program: hscurses swimming fish example (bsd3, program)
    hsdev library and programs: Haskell development library and tool with support of autocompletion, symbol info, go to declaration, find references etc. (bsd3, library, program)
    hsdip library and program: hsdip - a Diplomacy parser/renderer (bsd3, library, program)
    hsenv program: Virtual Haskell Environment builder (bsd3, program)
    hserv program: Simple http server in haskell. (mit, program)
    hsfcsh programs: Incremental builder for flash (bsd3, program)
    hsfilt program: Z-decoder. (mit, program)
    hsgtd program: Console-based gettings-things-done application (gpl, program)
    hsilop program: RPN calculator (mit, program)
    hsimport library and program: A command line program for extending the import list of a Haskell source file. (bsd3, library, program)
    hslackbuilder program: HSlackBuilder automatically generates slackBuild scripts from a cabal package (bsd3, program)
    hslinks program: Resolves links to Haskell identifiers. (bsd3, program)
    hsnock library and program: Nock 5K interpreter. (library, program, public-domain)
    hsns program: a miniature network sniffer (bsd3, program)
    hsntp library and programs: Libraries to use SNTP protocol and small client/server implementations. (bsd3, library, program)
    hsoptions library and programs: Haskell library that supports command-line flag processing (apache, flag, flags, library, option, options, program)
    hspec-discover library and program: Automatically discover and run Hspec tests (library, mit, program)
    hspec-meta library and program: A version of Hspec which is used to test Hspec itself (library, mit, program)
    hspresent library and program: A terminal presentation tool (bsd3, library, program)
    hsprocess library and program: The Haskell Stream Processor command line utility (deprecated, gpl, library, program)
    hsqml-demo-morris program: HsQML-based implementation of Nine Men's Morris (bsd3, program)
    hsqml-demo-notes programs: Sticky notes example program implemented in HsQML (bsd3, program)
    hsqml-demo-samples programs: HsQML sample programs (bsd3, program)
    hsqml-morris program: HsQML-based implementation of Nine Men's Morris (bsd3, deprecated, program)
    hssourceinfo programs: get haskell source code info (bsd3, program)
    hstest program: Runs tests via QuickCheck1 and HUnit; like quickCheck-script but uses GHC api (bsd3, program)
    hstidy program: Takes haskell source on stdin, parses it, then prettyprints it to stdout. (bsd3, program)
    hstorchat library and program: Distributed instant messaging over Tor (gpl, library, program)
    hstradeking library and program: Tradeking API bindings for Haskell (bsd3, library, program)
    hstyle program: Checks Haskell source code for style compliance. (bsd3, program)
    hstzaar program: A two player abstract strategy game. (bsd3, program)
    hsubconvert program: One-time, faithful conversion of Subversion repositories to Git (bsd3, program)
    hsx library and program: HSX (Haskell Source with XML) allows literal XML syntax in Haskell source code. (bsd3, library, program)
    hsx2hs library and program: HSX (Haskell Source with XML) allows literal XML syntax in Haskell source code. (bsd3, library, program)
    htags program: A Haskell98 parsing tags program similar to ctags. (bsd3, program)
    htar program: Command-line tar archive utility. (bsd3, program)
    htime program: Timing utility for the command line (bsd3, program)
    html2hamlet program: HTML to Hamlet converter (bsd3, program)
    htodo program: A todo application. (bsd3, program)
    htoml library and program: Parser for TOML files (JSON, bsd3, configuration, language, library, parser, program)
    htsn program: Parse XML files from The Sports Network feed. (gpl, program)
    htsn-import program: Import XML files from The Sports Network into an RDBMS. (gpl, program)
    http-test library and program: Test framework for HTTP APIs (bsd3, library, program)
    htune program: harmonic analyser and tuner for musical instruments (bsd3, program)
    htzaar program: A two player abstract strategy game. (bsd3, program)
    hub program: For multiplexing GHC installations and providing development sandboxes (bsd3, program)
    hubris library and program: Support library for Hubris, the Ruby <=> Haskell bridge (library, program)
    hulk library and programs: IRC server written in Haskell. (bsd3, library, program)
    hums program: Haskell UPnP Media Server (gpl, program)
    hunit-gui library and program: A GUI testrunner for HUnit (library, program, public-domain)
    hunp program: Unpacker tool with DWIM (gpl, program)
    hunt-server program: A search and indexing engine server. (mit, program)
    hunt-server-cli program: A Command line Interface for the Hunt server. (mit, program)
    hurdle program: Extract function names from Windows DLLs. (bsd3, program)
    husk-scheme library and programs: R5RS Scheme interpreter, compiler, and library. (library, mit, program)
    husky program: A simple command line calculator. (gpl, program)
    hutton program: A program for the button on Reddit. (mit, program)
    huttons-razor program: Quick implemention of Hutton's Razor (bsd2, program)
    hwall-auth-iitk program: Initial version of firewall Authentication for IITK network. (bsd3, program)
    hws program: Simple Haskell Web Server (bsd3, program)
    hxmppc program: Haskell XMPP (Jabber Client) Command Line Interface (CLI) (bsd3, program)
    hxournal library and program: A pen notetaking program written in haskell (bsd3, library, program)
    hyahtzee program: A Yahtzee game implementation in Haskell (bsd3, program)
    hyakko program: Literate-style Documentation Generator (mit, program)
    hybrid program: A implementation of a type-checker for Lambda-H (bsd3, program)
    hydra-print library and programs: NCurses interface to view multiple ByteString streams in parallel. (bsd3, library, program)
    hydrogen-cli program: Hydrogen Data (mit, program)
    hylotab program: Tableau based theorem prover for hybrid logics (gpl, program)
    hyloutils programs: Very small programs for hybrid logics (gpl, program)
    hyperdrive library and program: a fast, trustworthy HTTP(s) server built (bsd3, library, program)
    ide-backend library and program: An IDE backend library (library, mit, program)
    ide-backend-server program: An IDE backend server (mit, program)
    ideas-math program: Interactive domain reasoner for logic and mathematics (gpl, program)
    idiii library and program: ID3v2 (tagging standard for MP3 files) library (bsd3, library, program)
    idris library and programs: Functional Programming Language with Dependent Types (bsd3, library, program)
    ihaskell library and program: A Haskell backend kernel for the IPython project. (library, mit, program)
    ihttp library and program: Incremental HTTP iteratee (bsd3, library, program)
    imagepaste program: Command-line image paste utility (bsd3, program)
    imapget program: Downloads email from imap SSL servers. (bsd3, program)
    imbib programs: Minimalistic reference manager. (gpl, program)
    imgurder library and program: Uploader for Imgur (bsd3, library, program)
    imm library and program: Retrieve RSS/Atom feeds and write one mail per new item in a maildir. (library, program)
    imparse library and program: Multi-platform parser analyzer and generator. (gpl, library, program)
    implicit library and program: Math-inspired programmatic 2&3D CAD: CSG, bevels, and shells; gcode export.. (gpl, library, program)
    inch program: A type-checker for Haskell with integer constraints (bsd3, program)
    infer-upstream program: Find the repository from where a given repo was forked (github, mit, program)
    infernu library and programs: Type inference and checker for JavaScript (experimental) (gpl, library, program)
    infinity program: (bsd3, program)
    informative library and program: A yesod subsite serving a wiki. (agpl, library, program)
    inject library and program: A minimalistic template engine (library, mit, program)
    inquire program: Console client for encyclopedias (gpl, program)
    inspection-proxy program: A simple proxy for debugging plaintext protocols communication (bsd3, program, proxy)
    interleavableGen program: Generates a version of a module using InterleavableIO (program)
    internetmarke program: Shell command for constructing custom stamps for German Post (gpl, program)
    interpol library and program: GHC preprocessor and library to enable variable interpolation in strings (gpl, library, program)
    io-manager library and program: Skeleton library around the IO monad. (bsd3, library, program)
    io-reactive library and program: An API for generating TIMBER style reactive objects. (bsd3, library, program)
    ip6addr program: Commandline tool to generate IPv6 address text representations (bsd3, program)
    ipatch program: interactive patch editor (gpl, program)
    iptables-helpers library and program: iptables rules parser/printer library (bsd3, library, program)
    iptadmin program: web-interface for iptables (bsd3, program)
    irc-core library and program: An IRC client library and text client (bsd3, library, program)
    ironforge library and program: A technical demo for Antisplice. (bsd3, library, program)
    isdicom library and program: An executable and library to determine if a file is a DICOM file (bsd3, library, program)
    isiz program: A program to show the size of image and whether suitable for wallpaper. (bsd3, program)
    ivory-bitdata library and program: Ivory bit-data support. (bsd3, library, program)
    ivory-examples programs: Ivory examples. (bsd3, program)
    ixdopp program: A preprocessor for expanding "ixdo" notation for indexed monads (bsd3, program)
    iyql program: CLI (command line interface) to YQL (gpl, program)
    j2hs program: j2hs (mit, program)
    jailbreak-cabal program: Strip version restrictions from build dependencies in Cabal files. (bsd3, program)
    jammittools library and program: Export sheet music and audio from Windows/Mac app Jammit (gpl, library, program)
    jarfind library and program: Tool for searching java classes, members and fields in classfiles and JAR archives (gpl, library, program)
    javasf program: A utility to print the SourceFile attribute of one or more Java class files. (bsd3, program)
    javav program: A utility to print the target version of Java class files. (bsd3, program)
    jdi library and program: Implementation of Java Debug Interface (gpl, library, program)
    jespresso library and program: Extract all JavaScript from an HTML page and consolidate it in one script. (bsd3, library, program)
    jmacro library and program: QuasiQuotation library for programmatic generation of Javascript code. (bsd3, library, program)
    jort program: JP's own ray tracer (program)
    jsaddle-hello program: JSaddle Hello World, an example package (mit, program)
    json-autotype library and program: Automatic type declaration for JSON input data (bsd3, library, program)
    json-b library and program: JSON parser that uses byte strings. (bsd3, library, program)
    json-tools programs: A collection of JSON tools (bsd3, program)
    json2yaml program: Utility to convert a file from JSON to YAML format. (deprecated) (bsd3, deprecated, program)
    jsonsql program: Interpolate JSON object values into SQL strings (mit, program)
    jsontsv program: JSON to TSV transformer (mit, program)
    jukebox library and program: A first-order reasoning toolbox (bsd3, library, program)
    jumpthefive library and program: an elementary symmetric chiffre for pragmatically protecting one's effects (bsd3, library, program)
    katt library and program: Client for the Kattis judge system. (bsd3, library, program)
    kbq-gu programs: Rpoku spoken word programming language (gpl, program)
    kdesrc-build-extra program: Build profiles for kdesrc-build (gpl, program)
    keera-posture program: Get notifications when your sitting posture is inappropriate. (program)
    keiretsu program: Multi-process orchestration for development and integration testing (program)
    keter library and program: Web application deployment manager, focusing on Haskell web frameworks (library, mit, program)
    kevin program: a dAmn  IRC proxy (gpl, program)
    keystore library and programs: Managing stores of secret things (bsd3, library, program)
    keyword-args library and program: Extract data from a keyword-args config file format (library, mit, program)
    kif-parser program: Process KIF iOS test logs (bsd3, program)
    kit program: A dependency manager for Xcode (Objective-C) projects (bsd3, program)
    kmeans-vector library and program: An implementation of the kmeans clustering algorithm based on the vector package (bsd3, library, program)
    knots library and program: Khovanov homology computations (library, mit, program)
    korfu program: The Korfu ORF Utility (gpl, program)
    laborantin-hs library and program: an experiment management framework (apache, library, program)
    labyrinth-server program: A complicated turn-based game - Web server (mit, program)
    lambda-bridge library and program: A bridge from Haskell (on a CPU) to VHDL on a FPGA. (bsd3, library, program)
    lambda-devs library and program: a Paralell-DEVS implementaion based on distributed-process (bsd3, library, program)
    lambda-toolbox program: An application to work with the lambda calculus (for learning) (bsd3, program)
    lambda2js program: Untyped Lambda calculus to JavaScript compiler (gpl, program)
    lambdaFeed program: RSS 2.0 feed generator (gpl, program)
    lambdaLit program: ... (mit, program)
    lambdabot program: Lambdabot is a development tool and advanced IRC bot (gpl, program)
    lambdacat library and program: Webkit Browser (bsd3, library, program)
    lambdacube program: A simple lambda cube type checker. (bsd3, program)
    lambdacube-examples programs: Examples for LambdaCube (bsd3, deprecated, program)
    lambdacube-samples programs: Samples for LambdaCube 3D (bsd3, program)
    lambdatwit programs: Lambdabot running as a twitter bot. Similar to the @fsibot f# bot. (mit, program)
    lambdiff program: Diff Viewer (bsd3, program)
    language-glsl library and program: GLSL abstract syntax tree, parser, and pretty-printer (bsd3, library, program)
    language-mixal library and program: Parser, pretty-printer, and AST types for the MIXAL assembly language (bsd3, library, program)
    language-openscad library and program: A simple parser for OpenSCAD (bsd3, library, program)
    language-puppet library and programs: Tools to parse and evaluate the Puppet DSL. (bsd3, library, program)
    language-python-colour program: Generate coloured XHTML for Python code. (bsd3, program)
    language-python-test programs: testing code for the language-python library (bsd3, program)
    lat program: Tool to track security alerts on LWN (gpl, program)
    latest-npm-version library and program: Find the latest version of a package on npm (library, mit, program)
    launchpad-control library and program: High and low-level interface to the Novation Launchpad midi controller. (bsd3, library, program)
    layers-game program: A prototypical 2d platform game. (bsd3, program)
    lazy-csv library and program: Efficient lazy parsers for CSV (comma-separated values). (bsd3, library, program)
    leaf program: A simple portfolio generator (gpl, program)
    leaky program: Robust space leak, and its strictification (auto-instrumentation, bsd3, diagnostic, forcing, instrumentation, leak, program, remedial, space, strictness, tools)
    learn-physics-examples programs: examples for learn-physics (bsd3, program)
    leetify program: Leetify text (bsd3, program)
    leksah library and programs: Haskell IDE written in Haskell (gpl, library, program)
    leksah-server library and programs: Metadata collection for leksah (gpl, library, program)
    lentil program: frugal issue tracker (gpl, program)
    lgtk library and program: Lens GUI Toolkit (bsd3, library, program)
    lhae program: Simple spreadsheet program (deprecated, gpl, program)
    lhs2TeX-hl program: Literate highlighter preprocessor for lhs2tex (mit, program)
    lhs2html program: Compile lhs in bird style to md, html, hs. (program, public-domain)
    lhs2tex program: Preprocessor for typesetting Haskell sources with LaTeX (gpl, program)
    lhslatex program: Tool for using pdflatex with .lhs files (bsd3, program)
    libhbb library and program: Backend for text editors to provide better Haskell editing support. (lgpl, library, program)
    life program: Conway's Life cellular automaton (bsd3, program)
    lifter program: A boulderdash-like game and solution validator (bsd3, program)
    line-break program: Convert newlines in text (gpl, program)
    line2pdf library and program: Simple command-line utility to convert text into PDF (bsd3, library, program)
    linear-algebra-cblas library and program: A linear algebra library with bindings to BLAS and LAPACK (bsd3, library, program)
    linear-maps library and programs: Finite maps for linear use (bsd3, library, program)
    linkchk program: linkchk is a network interface link ping monitor. (gpl, program)
    linkcore program: Combines multiple GHC Core modules into a single module (bsd3, program)
    linux-perf library and programs: Read files generated by perf on Linux (bsd3, library, program)
    linx-gateway library and program: Implementation of the Enea LINX gateway protocol. (library, mit, program)
    lio-simple library and program: LIO support for the Simple web framework (lgpl, library, program)
    liquid-fixpoint library and programs: Predicate Abstraction-based Horn-Clause/Implication Constraint Solver (bsd3, library, program)
    liquidhaskell library and program: Liquid Types for Haskell (bsd3, library, program)
    list-remote-forwards program: List all remote forwards for mail accounts stored in a SQL database. (gpl, program)
    lit program: A simple tool for literate programming (gpl, program)
    live-sequencer library and program: Live coding of MIDI music (gpl, library, program)
    llsd library and program: An implementation of the LLSD data system (library, mit, program)
    llvm-pkg-config program: Generate Pkg-Config configuration file for LLVM (bsd3, program)
    llvm-pretty-bc-parser library and program: LLVM bitcode parsing library (bsd3, library, program)
    llvm-tools library and programs: Useful tools built on llvm-analysis (bsd3, library, program)
    loch library and program: Support for precise error locations in source files (bsd3, library, program)
    log2json library and program: Turn log file records into JSON. (gpl, library, program)
    lojban library and program: Useful utilities for the Lojban language (bsd3, library, program)
    lojbanParser library and program: lojban parser (bsd3, library, program)
    lojbanXiragan library and program: lojban to xiragan (bsd3, library, program)
    lojysamban program: Prolog with lojban (bsd3, program)
    loopy program: Find all biological feedback loops within an ecosystem graph. (bsd3, program)
    lord library and program: A command line interface to online radios. (library, program, public-domain)
    lorem library and program: Library for generating filler text (bsd3, library, program)
    loshadka program: Minecraft 1.7 server proxy that answers to queries when the server is offline (mit, program)
    lostcities program: An implementation of an adictive two-player card game (gpl, program)
    ls-usb program: List USB devices (bsd3, program)
    lscabal program: List exported modules from a set of .cabal files (bsd3, program)
    lsystem program: Paint an L-System Grammar (bsd3, program)
    ltext library and program: Higher-order file applicator (bsd3, library, program)
    lucienne programs: Server side feed aggregator/reader (deprecated, gpl, program)
    lushtags program: Create ctags compatible tags files for Haskell programs (mit, program)
    lvmlib library and program: The Lazy Virtual Machine (LVM). (bsd3, library, program)
    lvmrun program: The Lazy Virtual Machine (LVM) Runtime System. (lgpl, program)
    lye program: A Lilypond-compiling music box (mit, program)
    maam library and program: An application of the Galois Transformers framework to two example semantics. (bsd3, library, program)
    maclight library and program: Control screen and keyboard backlights on MACs under Linux (library, mit, program)
    macosx-make-standalone program: Make a macosx app standalone deployable (bsd3, program)
    mage program: Rogue-like (bsd3, program)
    mahoro program: ImageBoards to XMPP gate (gpl, program)
    maid program: A simple static web server (bsd3, program)
    mailbox-count program: Count mailboxes in a SQL database. (gpl, program)
    mailchimp-subscribe program: MailChimp subscription request handler (mit, program)
    mailgun library and programs: Connector to Rackspace's Mailgun Service (library, mit, program)
    majordomo library and programs: Majordomo protocol for ZeroMQ (bsd3, library, program)
    make-hard-links program: Change duplicated files into hard-links. (gpl, program)
    make-package program: Make a cabalized package (bsd3, program)
    manatee library and program: The Haskell/Gtk+ Integrated Live Environment (gpl, library, program)
    manatee-all library and program: Virtual package to install all Manatee packages. (gpl, library, program)
    manatee-anything library and program: Multithread interactive input/search framework for Manatee (gpl, library, program)
    manatee-browser library and program: Browser extension for Manatee. (gpl, library, program)
    manatee-curl library and program: Download Manager extension for Manatee. (gpl, library, program)
    manatee-editor library and program: Editor extension for Manatee. (gpl, library, program)
    manatee-filemanager library and program: File manager extension for Manatee. (gpl, library, program)
    manatee-imageviewer library and program: Image viewer extension for Manatee. (gpl, library, program)
    manatee-ircclient library and programs: IRC client extension for Manatee. (gpl, library, program)
    manatee-mplayer library and programs: Mplayer client extension for Manatee. (gpl, library, program)
    manatee-pdfviewer library and program: PDF viewer extension for Manatee. (gpl, library, program)
    manatee-processmanager library and program: Process manager extension for Manatee. (gpl, library, program)
    manatee-reader library and program: Feed reader extension for Manatee. (gpl, library, program)
    manatee-template library and program: Template code to create Manatee application. (gpl, library, program)
    manatee-terminal library and program: Terminal Emulator extension for Manatee. (gpl, library, program)
    manatee-welcome library and program: Welcome module to help user play Manatee quickly. (gpl, library, program)
    mancala program: Simple mancala game. (lgpl, program)
    mandulia program: A zooming visualisation of the Mandelbrot Set as many Julia Sets. (gpl, program)
    mangopay library and program: Bindings to the MangoPay API (bsd3, library, program)
    marionetta program: A study of marionetta movements. (bsd3, program)
    markdown-unlit library and program: Literate Haskell support for Markdown (library, mit, program)
    markdown2svg program: markdown to svg converter (bsd3, program)
    markup-preview program: A simple markup document preview (markdown, textile, reStructuredText) (gpl, program)
    marmalade-upload library and program: Upload packages to Marmalade (library, mit, program)
    marquise library and programs: Client library for Vaultaire (bsd3, library, program)
    marxup library and program: Markup language preprocessor for Haskell (gpl, library, program)
    masakazu-bot program: @minamiyama1994_bot on haskell (gpl, program)
    mastermind program: console mastermind decypher (bsd3, program)
    mathblog programs: A program for creating and managing a static weblog with LaTeX math and function graphs (bsd3, program)
    mathgenealogy program: Discover your (academic) ancestors! (gpl, program)
    matsuri program: ncurses XMPP client (gpl, program)
    maxsharing program: Maximal sharing of terms in the lambda calculus with letrec (bsd3, program)
    maybench library and programs: Automated benchmarking tool (bsd3, library, program)
    mbox-tools programs: A collection of tools to process mbox files (bsd3, program)
    mcmaster-gloss-examples programs: (mit, program)
    mdcat library and program: Markdown viewer in your terminal (library, mit, program)
    mdo program: Command-line tool to run a command on each of the items. (bsd3, program)
    mecha library and program: A constructive solid geometry (CSG) modeling language. (bsd3, library, program)
    mediawiki library and programs: Interfacing with the MediaWiki API (bsd3, library, program)
    mediawiki2latex program: Convert MediaWiki text to LaTeX (gpl, program)
    mega-sdist program: Handles uploading to Hackage from mega repos (deprecated) (deprecated, mit, program)
    melody library and program: A functional scripting language (library, mit, program)
    memscript program: Command line utility for memorizing scriptures or any other text (gpl, program)
    mida library and program: Language for algorithmic generation of MIDI files (gpl, library, program)
    midi-music-box program: Convert MIDI file to music box punch tape (bsd3, program)
    midimory program: A Memory-like (Concentration, Pairs, ...) game for tones (bsd3, program)
    midisurface program: A control midi surface (bsd3, program)
    mighttpd programs: Simple Web Server in Haskell (bsd3, program)
    mighttpd2 library and programs: High performance web server on WAI/warp (bsd3, library, program)
    mines program: Minesweeper simulation using neural networks (program)
    minesweeper program: Minesweeper game which is always solvable without guessing (bsd3, program)
    miniforth library and program: Miniature FORTH-like interpreter (library, mit, program)
    minimung program: Shows how to run grabber on Mac OS X (bsd3, program)
    minions program: A fast parallel ssh tool (bsd3, program)
    miniplex library and programs: simple 1-to-N interprocess communication (lgpl, library, program)
    minirotate program: Minimalistic file rotation utility (bsd3, program)
    ministg program: an interpreter for an operational semantics for the STG machine. (bsd3, program)
    mirror-tweet program: Tweet mirror (gpl, program)
    misfortune library and programs: fortune-mod clone (library, program, public-domain)
    mixed-strategies library and program: Find optimal mixed strategies for two-player games (library, mit, program)
    mkbndl program: Makes an OS X .app bundle from a binary. (gpl, program)
    mkcabal program: Generate cabal files for a Haskell project (gpl, program)
    ml-w library and program: Minimal ML language to to demonstrate the W type infererence algorithm. (library, program, public-domain)
    modsplit library and program: Haskell source splitter driven by special comments. (bsd3, library, program)
    module-management library and program: Clean up module imports, split and merge modules (bsd3, library, program)
    modulo library and program: Modular C code generator (gpl, library, program)
    mohws library and program: Modular Haskell Web Server (bsd3, library, program)
    monadloc-pp program: A preprocessor for generating monadic call traces (program, public-domain)
    monitor program: Do things when files change. (mit, program)
    morfette program: A tool for supervised learning of morphology (bsd3, program)
    morte library and program: A bare-bones calculus of constructions (bsd3, library, program)
    mp program: Music player for linux. (gpl, program)
    mp3decoder program: MP3 decoder for teaching. (program)
    mpdmate program: MPD/PowerMate executable (bsd3, program)
    mprover program: Simple equational reasoning for a Haskell-ish language (bsd3, program)
    mpvguihs program: A minimalist mpv GUI written in I/O heavy Haskell. (gpl, program)
    msgpack-idl library and program: An IDL Compiler for MessagePack (bsd3, library, program)
    msi-kb-backlit program: A command line tool to change backlit colors of your MSI keyboards (bsd3, program)
    msu program: Monitor Setup Utility (mit, program)
    mudbath program: Continuous deployment server for use with GitHub (program)
    mueval library and programs: Safely evaluate pure Haskell expressions (bsd3, library, program)
    multifocal library and program: Bidirectional Two-level Transformation of XML Schemas (bsd3, library, program)
    multihash library and program: Multihash library and CLI executable (bsd3, library, program)
    multiplicity program: Wrapper program for duplicity, adding config files (bsd3, program)
    muon program: Static blog generator (bsd3, program)
    music-preludes library and programs: Some useful preludes for the Music Suite. (bsd3, library, program)
    music-util program: Utility for developing the Music Suite. (bsd3, program)
    musicbrainz-email library and programs: Send an email to all MusicBrainz editors (deprecated, gpl, library, program)
    mustache-haskell library and program: Straight implementation of mustache templates (library, mit, program)
    mustache2hs program: Utility to generate Haskell code from Mustache templates (program)
    mute-unmute program: Watches your screensaver and (un)mutes music when you (un)lock the screen. (gpl, program)
    mysnapsession-example programs: Example projects using mysnapsession (bsd3, program)
    n-m library and program: Utility to call iwconfig. (deprecated, library, program)
    nanoAgda program: A toy dependently-typed language (program)
    nc-indicators program: CPU load and memory usage indicators for i3bar (apache, program)
    neat library and program: A Fast Retargetable Template Engine (library, mit, program)
    nehe-tuts programs: Port of the NeHe OpenGL tutorials to Haskell. (bsd3, program)
    neil program: General tools for Neil (bsd3, program)
    nerf library and program: Nerf, the named entity recognition tool based on linear-chain CRFs (bsd3, library, program)
    netlines library and program: Enumerator tools for text-based network protocols (bsd3, library, program)
    network-anonymous-tor library and program: Haskell API for Tor anonymous networking (library, mit, program)
    network-bitcoin library and program: An interface to bitcoind. (bsd3, library, program)
    network-builder library and program: Linux NetworkNameSpace Builder (bsd3, library, program)
    network-server library and program: A light abstraction over sockets & co. for servers (gpl, library, program)
    network-topic-models programs: A few network topic model implementations for bayes-stack (bsd3, program)
    newports program: List ports newer than N days on a FreeBSD system (bsd3, program)
    newsynth library and program: Exact and approximate synthesis of quantum circuits (gpl, library, program)
    newt library and program: A trivially simple app to create things from simple templates. (bsd3, library, program)
    ngrams-loader library and program: Ngrams loader based on http://www.ngrams.info format (library, mit, program)
    nicify program: Pretty print the standard output of default `Show` instances. (mit, program)
    nicovideo-translator library and program: Nico Nico Douga () Comment Translator (agpl, library, program)
    nikepub program: Command line utility publishes Nike+ runs on blogs and Twitter (lgpl, program)
    nixfromnpm program: Generate nix expressions from npm packages. (mit, program)
    nkjp library and programs: Manipulating the National Corpus of Polish (NKJP) (bsd3, library, program)
    nlp-scores-scripts programs: NLP scoring command-line programs (bsd3, program)
    nm library and program: Network Manager, binding to libnm-glib. (bsd3, library, program)
    nofib-analyze program: Parse and compare nofib runs (bsd3, program)
    noise library and program: A friendly language for graphic design (library, mit, program)
    noodle library and programs: the noodle programming language (library, program)
    not-gloss-examples programs: examples for not-gloss (bsd3, program)
    notmuch-haskell library and program: Binding for notmuch MUA library (lgpl, library, program)
    nptools programs: A collection of random tools (bsd3, program)
    nth-prime program: Computing the nth prime (mit, program)
    nyan program: Bored? Nyan cat! (bsd3, program)
    nymphaea program: An interactive GUI for manipulating L-systems (bsd3, program)
    octohat library and program: A tested, minimal wrapper around GitHub's API. (library, mit, program)
    octopus library and program: Lisp with more dynamism, more power, more simplicity. (gpl, library, program)
    ohloh-hs library and program: Interface to the Ohloh API (bsd3, library, program)
    olwrapper library and program: An OpenLayers JavaScript Wrapper and Webframework with snaplet-fay (bsd3, gis, library, program)
    omaketex program: A simple tool to generate OMakefile for latex files. (bsd3, cli, program, tex, tools, utility)
    omega program: A purely functional programming language and a proof system (bsd3, program)
    omnicodec programs: data encoding and decoding command line utilities (program)
    on-demand-ssh-tunnel library and program: Program that sends traffic through SSH tunnels on-demand (library, mit, program)
    only program: A grep-like tool for filtering on words or lines. (gpl, program)
    open-union library and program: Extensible, type-safe unions. (library, mit, program)
    openssh-github-keys library and program: Fetch OpenSSH keys from a GitHub team (library, mit, program)
    opentheory-char library and program: Unicode characters (deprecated, library, mit, program)
    opn program: Open files or URLs using associated programs. (bsd3, program)
    optimal-blocks library and program: Optimal Block boundary determination for rsync-like behaviours (bsd3, library, program)
    optimusprime program: A supercompiler for f-lite (bsd3, program)
    orc library and program: Orchestration-style co-ordination EDSL (bsd3, library, program)
    orchid-demo program: Haskell Wiki Demo (bsd3, program)
    organize-imports program: Organize scala imports (gpl, program)
    osdkeys library and program: Show keys pressed with an on-screen display (Linux only) (bsd3, library, program)
    ottparse-pretty program: Pretty-printer for Ott parse trees (bsd3, program)
    package-o-tron library and programs: Utilities for working with cabal packages and your package database (bsd3, library, program)
    package-vt program: Haskell Package Versioning Tool (bsd3, program)
    packdeps library and program: Check your cabal packages for lagging dependencies. (bsd3, library, program)
    packunused program: Tool for detecting redundant Cabal package dependencies (bsd3, program)
    pacman-memcache program: Read whole Pacman database which pushes it into the memory cache (bsd3, program)
    pagarme library and program: Pagarme API wrapper (library, mit, program)
    pager library and program: Open up a pager, like 'less' or 'more' (bsd2, library, program)
    palindromes library and program: Finding palindromes in strings (bsd3, library, program)
    pandoc library and programs: Conversion between markup formats (gpl, library, program)
    pandoc-citeproc library and program: Supports using pandoc with citeproc (bsd3, library, program)
    pandoc-crossref program: Pandoc filter for cross-references (gpl, program)
    pandoc-csv2table library and program: Convert CSV to Pandoc Table Markdown (library, mit, program)
    pandoc-unlit program: Literate Haskell support for GitHub's Markdown flavor (deprecated, mit, program)
    papillon library and program: packrat parser (bsd3, library, program)
    pappy program: Packrat parsing; linear-time parsers for grammars in TDPL. (bsd3, program)
    paragon library and program: Paragon (bsd3, library, program)
    parconc-examples programs: Examples to accompany the book "Parallel and Concurrent Programming in Haskell" (bsd3, program)
    parseargs library and program: Command-line argument parsing library for Haskell programs (bsd3, library, program)
    parser-helper program: Prints Haskell parse trees in JSON. (apache, program)
    parsestar library and programs: NMR-STAR file format parser. (bsd3, library, program)
    partly library and program: Inspect, create, and alter MBRs. (bsd3, library, program)
    pasty program: A simple command line pasting utility (gpl, program)
    patch-image program: Compose a big image from overlapping parts (bsd3, program)
    patronscraper program: A webpage scraper for Patreon which dumps a list of patrons to a text file. (mit, program)
    paypal-adaptive-hoops library and program: Client for a limited part of PayPal's Adaptive Payments API (library, mit, program)
    pb program: pastebin command line application (bsd3, program)
    pcd-loader library and program: PCD file loader. (bsd3, library, program)
    pdf-toolbox-viewer program: Simple pdf viewer (bsd3, program)
    pdf2line programs: Simple command-line utility to convert PDF into text (gpl, program)
    pdfsplit program: split two-column PDFs, so there is one column per page (bsd3, program)
    pec library and programs: pec embedded compiler (bsd3, library, program)
    peg program: a lazy non-deterministic concatenative programming language (gpl, program)
    perdure library and program: Robust persistence for acyclic immutable data (library, program)
    persona-idp program: Persona (BrowserID) Identity Provider (agpl, program)
    pesca program: Proof Editor for Sequent Calculus (gpl, program)
    pg-harness library and program: REST service and library for creating/consuming temporary PostgreSQL databases (agpl, library, program)
    pg-harness-server program: REST service for creating temporary PostgreSQL databases (agpl, program)
    pgdl program: simply download a video from webpage and play it. (program, public-domain)
    photoname program: Rename JPEG photo files based on shoot date (bsd3, program)
    phraskell program: A fractal viewer. (gpl, program)
    phybin library and program: Utility for clustering phylogenetic trees in Newick format based on Robinson-Foulds distance. (bsd3, library, program)
    pi-calculus program: Applied pi-calculus interpreter (gpl, program)
    pia-forward program: Set up port forwarding with the Private Internet Access VPN service. (gpl, program)
    piet library and program: A Piet interpreter (bsd3, library, program)
    piki program: Yet another text-to-html converter (bsd3, program)
    pipeclip program: Open your editor, pipe the output to the system clipboard (bsd2, program)
    pipes-attoparsec-streaming library and program: Streaming parsing in the pipes-core framework with Attoparsec. (bsd3, deprecated, library, program)
    pipes-p2p-examples program: Examples using pipes-p2p (bsd3, deprecated, program)
    pipes-rt library and program: A few pipes to control the timing of yields (bsd3, library, program)
    pisigma library and program: A dependently typed core language (bsd3, library, program)
    pit library and program: Account management tool. (library, mit, program)
    pkggraph program: Package dependency graph for installed packages (bsd3, program)
    playlists library and program: Library and executable for working with playlist files. (bsd3, library, program)
    plot-lab program: A plotting tool with Mathematica like Manipulation abilities (deprecated, gpl, program)
    ply-loader library and program: PLY file loader. (bsd3, library, program)
    pocket-dns library and program: Multi-backend (zookeeper and sqlite) DNS Server using persistent-library (bsd3, library, program)
    pointfree library and program: Tool for refactoring expressions into pointfree form (library, program)
    pointful library and program: Pointful refactoring tool (bsd3, library, program)
    polh-lexicon library and programs: A library for manipulating the historical dictionary of Polish (deprecated) (bsd3, library, program)
    polyseq library and program: Taming Selective Strictness (deprecated, library, program, public-domain)
    pontarius-mediaserver program: Extended Personal Media Network (XPMN) media server (deprecated, program)
    pony program: Can I have a pony? (bsd3, program)
    porte library and program: FreeBSD ports index search and analysis tool (bsd3, library, program)
    postgresql-orm library and program: An ORM (Object Relational Mapping) and migrations DSL for PostgreSQL. (gpl, library, program)
    postgresql-simple-migration library and program: PostgreSQL Schema Migrations (bsd3, library, program)
    postgrest library and program: REST API for any Postgres database (library, mit, program)
    postmaster program: Postmaster ESMTP Server (gpl, program)
    practice-room program: Practice Room (bsd3, program)
    precis library and program: Diff Cabal packages. (library, program)
    prednote-test library and programs: Tests and QuickCheck generators to accompany prednote. (bsd3, deprecated, library, program)
    pretty-show library and program: Tools for working with derived `Show` instances and generic inspection of values. (library, mit, program)
    primula-board program: ImageBoard on Happstack and HSP (gpl, program)
    primula-bot program: Jabber-bot for primula-board ImageBoard (gpl, program)
    printxosd program: Simple tool to display some text on an on-screen display (bsd3, program)
    priority-sync library and program: Cooperative task prioritization. (bsd3, library, program)
    proctest library and program: An IO library for testing interactive command line programs (library, mit, program)
    prof2dot program: Convert GHC profiles into GraphViz's dot format (bsd3, program)
    prof2pretty programs: generate pretty source from time/allocation profiles (bsd3, program)
    profiteur program: Treemap visualiser for GHC prof files (bsd3, program)
    progressive program: Multilabel classification model which learns sequentially (online). (bsd3, program)
    prolog-graph program: A command line tool to visualize query resolution in Prolog. (program, public-domain)
    propellor library and programs: property-based host configuration management in haskell (bsd3, library, program)
    protobuf-native library and program: Protocol Buffers via C++ (bsd3, library, program)
    prove-everywhere-server program: The server for ProveEverywhere (bsd3, program)
    pub programs: Pipe stdin to a redis pub/sub channel (bsd3, program)
    pubnub library and programs: PubNub Haskell SDK (library, mit, program)
    pubsub library and programs: A library for Google/SixApart pubsub hub interaction (bsd3, library, program)
    puffytools library and program: A CLI assistant (bsd3, library, program)
    pugs-DrIFT library and program: DrIFT with pugs-specific rules. (bsd3, library, program)
    puppetresources program: A program that displays the puppet resources associated to a node given .pp files. (deprecated, gpl, program)
    pure-priority-queue-tests program: Tests for the pure-priority-queue package (bsd3, program)
    purescript library and programs: PureScript Programming Language Compiler (library, mit, program)
    pushme program: Tool to synchronize multiple directories with rsync, zfs or git-annex (bsd3, program)
    puzzle-draw library and program: Creating graphics for pencil puzzles. (library, mit, program)
    puzzle-draw-cmdline program: Creating graphics for pencil puzzles, command line tools. (deprecated, mit, program)
    pvd programs: A photo viewer daemon application with remote controlling abilities. (bsd3, photo, program)
    pwstore-cli program: Command line interface for the pwstore library (gpl, program)
    pxsl-tools program: Parsimonious XML Shorthand Language--to-XML compiler (gpl, program)
    python-pickle library and program: Serialization/deserialization using Python Pickle format. (bsd3, library, program)
    quantfin library and program: Quant finance library in pure Haskell. (bsd3, library, program)
    qudb program: Quite Useless DB (lgpl, program)
    quenya-verb library and program: Quenya verb conjugator (agpl, library, program)
    quickcheck-script program: Automated test tool for QuickCheck. (bsd3, program)
    quickpull library and program: Generate Main module with QuickCheck tests (bsd3, deprecated, library, program)
    quicktest program: A reflective batch tester for Haskell. (bsd3, program)
    quoridor-hs library and program: A Quoridor implementation in Haskell (bsd3, library, program)
    rabocsv2qif library and program: A library and program to create QIF files from Rabobank CSV exports. (gpl, library, program)
    radix program: Command-line tool for emitting numbers in various bases. (bsd3, program)
    rail-compiler-editor library and programs: Compiler and editor for the esolang rail. (library, mit, program)
    randfile program: Program for picking a random file (bsd3, program)
    randomgen program: A fast, SMP parallel random data generator (bsd3, program)
    randsolid program: Set the background of your root window to a random colour. (program, public-domain)
    rascal library and program: A command-line client for Reddit (library, mit, program)
    rasterific-svg library and program: SVG renderer based on Rasterific. (bsd3, library, program)
    rbr programs: Mask nucleotide (EST) sequences in Fasta format (gpl, program)
    rdf4h library and program: A library for RDF processing in Haskell (bsd3, library, program)
    rdioh library and programs: A Haskell wrapper for Rdio's API. (library, mit, program)
    reaction-logic library and program: pluggable pure logic serializable reactor (bsd3, library, program)
    reactive-thread library and program: Reactive programming via imperative threads (bsd3, library, program)
    readpyc program: Read and pretty print Python bytecode (.pyc) files. (bsd3, program)
    record-preprocessor library and program: Compiler preprocessor introducing a syntactic extension for anonymous records (library, mit, program)
    recursive-line-count program: Count lines in files and display them hierarchically (bsd3, program)
    redo program: software build system, make replacement, implementation of djb's redo (program, public-domain)
    refh program: A command-line tool for pasting to https://www.refheap.com (mit, program)
    regex-genex library and program: From a regex, generate all possible strings it can match (library, program)
    regex-posix-unittest program: Unit tests for the plaform's Posix regex library (bsd3, program)
    regex-tdfa-unittest program: Unit tests for the regex-tdfa (bsd3, program)
    regexchar library and program: A POSIX, extended regex-engine. (gpl, library, program)
    reheat program: to make notes and reduce impact on idle time on writing other programms. (gpl, program)
    rehoo program: Rebuild default.hoo from many .hoo files in the current directory (bsd3, program)
    reify library and program: Serialize data (gpl, library, program)
    relational-record-examples program: Examples of Haskell Relationa Record (bsd3, program)
    remote-debugger program: Interface to ghci debugger (bsd3, program)
    repa-examples programs: Examples using the Repa array library. (bsd3, program)
    repa-v4l2 library and program: Provides high-level access to webcams. (lgpl, library, program)
    repo-based-blog library and program: Blogging module using blaze html for markup (bsd3, library, program)
    reserve program: Reserve reloads web applications (mit, program)
    resolve-trivial-conflicts program: Remove trivial conflict markers in a git repository (gpl, program)
    resource-embed program: Embed data files via C and FFI. (mit, program)
    respond library and program: process and route HTTP requests and generate responses on top of WAI (bsd3, library, program)
    restyle library and program: Convert between camel case and separated words style. (library, mit, program)
    rethinkdb library and program: A driver for RethinkDB 2.0 (apache, library, program)
    retryer program: Retry failed commands (mpl, program)
    revdectime program: A French revolutionary decimal time (metric) clock (gpl, program)
    reversi program: Text-only reversi (aka othelo) game (lgpl, program)
    rewrite program: open file and rewrite it with new contents (bsd3, program)
    rezoom program: Github resume generator (deprecated, gpl, program)
    rhythm-game-tutorial programs: Haskell rhythm game tutorial (bsd3, program)
    riff library and programs: RIFF parser for Haskell (library, mit, program)
    riot program: Riot is an Information Organisation Tool (gpl, program)
    risc386 program: Reduced instruction set i386 simulator (bsd3, program)
    rivet program: A project management tool for Haskell applications. (bsd3, program)
    rncryptor library and programs: Haskell implementation of the RNCryptor file format (library, mit, program)
    roguestar program: Sci-fi roguelike game. Client application. (program)
    roguestar-engine program: Sci-fi roguelike game. Backend. (program)
    roguestar-glut program: Sci-fi roguelike game. GLUT front-end. (program)
    roller library and program: Playing with applicatives and dice! (gpl, library, program)
    rosa program: Query the namecoin blockchain (mit, program)
    roshask library and program: Haskell support for the ROS robotics framework. (bsd3, library, program)
    route-generator program: Utility to generate routes for use with yesod-routes (program)
    rpc-framework library and program: a remote procedure call framework (bsd3, library, program)
    rpf program: Receiver Policy Framework (bsd3, program)
    rss2irc program: watches an RSS/Atom feed and writes it to an IRC channel (bsd3, program)
    ruler program: Ruler tool for UHC (bsd3, program)
    ruler-core program: (lgpl, program)
    runghc program: runghc replacement for fast repeated runs (gpl, program)
    rws program: Packet Generation (bsd3, program)
    salvia-demo library and programs: Demo Salvia servers. (bsd3, library, program)
    samtools-conduit library and program: Conduit interface to SAM/BAM format files through samtools (library, mit, program)
    sandman program: Manages Cabal sandboxes to avoid rebuilding packages. (mit, program)
    sat programs: CNF SATisfier (gpl, program)
    sat-micro-hs program: A minimal SAT solver (lgpl, program)
    satchmo-examples programs: examples that show how to use satchmo (gpl, program)
    sbv library and program: SMT Based Verification: Symbolic Haskell theorem prover using SMT solving. (bsd3, library, program)
    scaleimage program: Scale an image to a new geometry (bsd3, program)
    scan program: lexical style suggestions for source code (bsd3, program)
    scat program: Generates unique passwords for various websites from a single password. (bsd3, program)
    scc library and program: Streaming component combinators (gpl, library, program)
    schedevr programs: Marge schedules and show EVR (bsd3, program)
    schedule-planner program: Find the ideal lesson layout (lgpl, program)
    scholdoc library and program: Converts ScholarlyMarkdown documents to HTML5/LaTeX/Docx format (gpl, library, program)
    scholdoc-citeproc library and program: Scholdoc fork of pandoc-citeproc (bsd3, library, program)
    scion-browser library and program: Command-line interface for browsing and searching packages documentation (bsd3, library, program)
    scons2dot program: Generates graphviz file of scons dependency information (gpl, program)
    scope-cairo library and program: An interactive renderer for plotting time-series data (bsd3, library, program)
    scp-streams library and programs: An SCP protocol implementation. (bsd3, library, program)
    scrabble-bot program: Scrabble play generation. (bsd3, program)
    scrobble library and program: Scrobbling server. (bsd3, library, program)
    scroll program: scroll(6), a roguelike game (gpl, program)
    scrz program: Process management and supervision daemon (program)
    scyther-proof program: Automatic generation of Isabelle/HOL correctness proofs for security protocols. (gpl, program)
    secdh library and program: SECDH Machine Simulator (bsd3, library, program)
    secret-santa program: Secret Santa game assigner using QR-Codes (gpl, program)
    secrm program: Example of writing "secure" file removal in Haskell rather than C. (program, public-domain)
    sensenet program: Distributed sensor network for the raspberry pi (mit, program)
    sentry library and programs: Process monitoring tool written and configured in Haskell (bsd3, library, program)
    seqaid library and programs: Dynamic strictness control, including space leak repair (auto-instrumentation, bsd3, diagnostic, forcing, ghc-plugin, instrumentation, leak, library, parallel, program, remedial, space, strictness, tools)
    seqloc-datafiles library and programs: Read and write BED and GTF format genome annotations (library, mit, program)
    sequor library and programs: A sequence labeler based on Collins's sequence perceptron. (bsd3, library, program)
    servant-docs library and program: generate API docs for your servant webservice (bsd3, library, program)
    servant-ede library and program: Combinators for rendering EDE templates in servant web applications (bsd3, library, program)
    servant-examples programs: Example programs for servant (bsd3, program)
    servant-server library and program: A family of combinators for defining webservices APIs and serving them (bsd3, library, program)
    servius program: Serve Shakespearean templates via Warp (deprecated) (deprecated, mit, program)
    setdown program: Treating files as sets to perform rapid set manipulation. (bsd3, program)
    sexp library and program: S-Expression parsing/printing made fun and easy (gpl, library, program)
    sexp-show program: Produce a s-expression representation of Show values. (bsd3, deprecated, program)
    sgrep program: Sgrep - grep Fasta files for sequences matching a regular expression (gpl, program)
    sha-streams library and program: SHA hashes for io-streams. (bsd3, library, program)
    shadower program: An automated way to run doctests in files that are changing (program, public-domain)
    shadowsocks programs: A fast tunnel proxy that help you get through firewalls (mit, program)
    shake library and program: Build system library, like Make, but more accurate dependencies. (bsd3, library, program)
    shake-cabal-build program: Utility for building Shake build systems using Cabal sandboxes (apache, program)
    shaker library and program: simple and interactive command-line build tool (bsd3, library, program)
    she library and program: A Haskell preprocessor adding miscellaneous features (library, program, public-domain)
    shell-pipe library and programs: Pipe streams through external shell commands (deprecated, gpl, library, program)
    shelltestrunner program: A tool for testing command-line programs. (gpl, program)
    showdown program: A simple gtk based Russian Roulette game. (bsd3, program)
    shplit program: A Haskell pattern splitter with emacs attachments (program, public-domain)
    shuffle library and program: Shuffle tool for UHC (bsd3, library, program)
    sifflet program: A simple, visual, functional programming language. (bsd3, program)
    simgi program: stochastic simulation engine (gpl, program)
    simple library and program: A minimalist web framework for the WAI server interface (lgpl, library, program)
    simple-eval library and program: Evaluate a Text to an Integer: "1 + 1" -> 2 (gpl, library, program)
    simple-genetic-algorithm library and program: Simple parallel genetic algorithm implementation (bsd3, library, program)
    simple-neural-networks library and programs: Simple parallel neural networks implementation (bsd3, library, program)
    simple-pascal library and program: Simplified Pascal language to SSVM compiler (bsd3, library, program)
    simple-stacked-vm library and program: Simple stacked virtual machine: assembler, disassembler, bytecode interpreter (bsd3, library, program)
    simpleprelude library and programs: A simplified Haskell prelude for teaching (bsd3, library, program)
    simplex program: A simple markup language that translates to LaTeX (gpl, latex, program)
    simseq program: Simulate sequencing with different models for priming and errors (gpl, program)
    sindre library and program: A programming language for simple GUIs (bsd3, library, program)
    sizes program: Recursively show space (size and i-nodes) used in subdirectories (bsd3, program)
    skypelogexport program: Export Skype chat logs to text files (bsd3, program)
    slack-notify-haskell library and program: Slack notifier for Haskell project. (library, mit, program)
    slice-cpp-gen program: Generate C++ skeletons from slice files (bsd3, program)
    slidemews program: ws convert markdown to reveal-js (gpl, program)
    sloane program: A command line interface to Sloane's On-Line Encyclopedia of Integer Sequences (bsd3, program)
    smallcaps library and programs: Flatten camel case text in LaTeX files (bsd3, library, program)
    smallpt-hs program: A Haskell port of the smallpt path tracer. (bsd3, program)
    smartcheck library and program: A smarter QuickCheck. (bsd3, library, program)
    smartword programs: Web based flash card for Word Smart I and II vocabularies (bsd3, program)
    smtp2mta program: Listen for SMTP traffic and send it to an MTA script (program)
    snap library and program: Top-level package for the Snap Web Framework (bsd3, library, program)
    snap-auth-cli program: Command-line tool to manage Snap AuthManager database (bsd3, program)
    snaplet-i18n library and program: snaplet-i18n (bsd3, library, program)
    snippet-extractor program: Extracts labeled snippets of code to files. (bsd3, program)
    snm library and program: The Simple Nice-Looking Manual Generator. (gpl, library, program)
    snowglobe program: randomized fractal snowflakes demo (gpl, program)
    sock2stream program: Tunnel a socket over a single datastream (stdin/stdout) (program)
    sonic-visualiser library and program: Sonic Visualiser (gpl, library, program)
    sorty program: Sort lines per file size (bsd3, program)
    sound-collage program: Approximate a song from other pieces of sound (bsd3, program)
    sounddelay program: Audio delay line (bsd3, program)
    source-code-server program: The server backend for the source code iPhone app (bsd3, deprecated, program)
    soyuz library and program: DCPU-16 architecture utilities for Notch's 0x10c game. (library, mit, program)
    spelling-suggest library and programs: Spelling suggestion tool with library and command-line interfaces. (bsd3, library, program)
    sphinx-cli program: Sphinx CLI and demo of Haskell Sphinx library (bsd3, program)
    spike program: Experimental web browser (bsd3, program)
    spline3 program: A parallel implementation of the Sorokina/Zeilfelder spline scheme. (gpl, program)
    split-record program: Split a big audio file into pieces at positions of silence (bsd3, program)
    splitter program: Use numerical ranges to split out certain lines from a file. (mit, program)
    splot program: A tool for visualizing the lifecycle of many concurrent multi-staged processes. (bsd3, program)
    spoonutil library and program: Spoon's utilities. Simple testing and nice looking error reporting. (gpl, library, program)
    spy program: A compact file system watcher for Mac OS X, Linux and Windows (bsd3, program)
    squeeze program: A file-packing application. (gpl, program)
    srcinst program: Build and install Debian packages completely from source (gpl, program)
    sshd-lint program: Check sshd configuration for adherence to best practices (mit, program)
    sshtun program: Wrapper daemon to manage an ssh tunnel (bsd3, program)
    sstable library and program: SSTables in Haskell (bsd3, library, program)
    ssv library and program: Comma-separated-value (CSV) read, show and write routines (library, mit, program)
    stable-tree library and program: Trees whose branches are resistant to change (bsd3, library, program)
    stack library and program: The Haskell Tool Stack (bsd3, library, program)
    stackage-build-plan library and program: Calculate and print (in different formats) Stackage build plans (library, mit, program)
    stackage-cabal library and programs: A CLI executable for cabal-based stackage commands (library, mit, program)
    stackage-cli library and programs: A CLI library for stackage commands (library, mit, program)
    stackage-curator library and program: Tools for curating Stackage bundles (library, mit, program)
    stackage-install library and program: Secure download of packages for cabal-install (library, mit, program)
    stackage-metadata library and program: Grab current metadata for all packages (library, mit, program)
    stackage-sandbox library and program: Work with shared stackage sandboxes (library, mit, program)
    stackage-setup library and program: An executable for downloading a Haskell setup (library, mit, program)
    stackage-update library and program: Update your package index incrementally (requires git) (library, mit, program)
    stackage-upload library and program: A more secure version of cabal upload which uses HTTPS (library, mit, program)
    standalone-haddock program: Generate standalone haddock documentation for a set of packages (mit, program)
    starrover2 program: Space simulation game (program)
    statechart program: Compiles Rhapsody statecharts to C. (bsd3, program)
    stats program: command line statistics (gpl, program)
    stdf library and programs: Parse Structured Test Data Format (STDF) (gpl, library, program)
    steambrowser program: List and launch steam games from the cli (mit, program)
    steeloverseer program: A file watcher. (bsd3, program)
    stratum-tool program: Client for Stratum protocol (agpl, program)
    strictify program: Find a local optimum of strictness annotations. (bsd3, program)
    structured-haskell-mode program: Structured editing Emacs mode for Haskell (bsd3, program)
    stunts program: A revival of the classic game Stunts (LambdaCube tech demo) (bsd3, program)
    stylish-haskell library and program: Haskell code prettifier (bsd3, library, program)
    subtitles program: Modify SRT subtitle files. (bsd3, program)
    suffixarray library and programs: n log n implementation of suffix array. (gpl, library, program)
    sugarhaskell programs: Library-based syntactic extensibility for Haskell (gpl, program)
    sunroof-examples programs: Tests for Sunroof (bsd3, program)
    supercollider-midi programs: Demonstrate how to control SuperCollider via ALSA-MIDI (gpl, program)
    superdoc library and program: Additional documentation markup and Unicode support (bsd3, library, program)
    supero program: A Supercompiler (bsd3, program)
    svg2q program: Code generation tool for Quartz code from a SVG. (bsd3, program)
    svgutils library and program: Helper functions for dealing with SVG files (bsd3, library, program)
    swearjure program: Clojure without alphanumerics. (lgpl, program)
    swish library and program: A semantic web toolkit. (lgpl, library, program)
    sws program: A simple web server for serving directories, similar to weborf. (bsd3, program)
    sylvia program: Lambda calculus visualization (gpl, program)
    synt library and program: Similar code analysis. (library, program)
    syntax-example program: Example application using syntax, a library for abstract syntax descriptions. (mit, program)
    syntax-example-json program: Example JSON parser/pretty-printer. (mit, program)
    system-lifted library and program: Lifted versions of System functions. (bsd3, library, program)
    table program: Simple tool to generate tables from DSV input (mit, program)
    tableaux program: An interactive theorem prover based on semantic tableaux (bsd3, program)
    tabloid program: View the output of shell commands in a table (bsd3, program)
    taffybar library and program: A desktop bar similar to xmobar, but with more GUI (bsd3, library, program)
    taggy library and program: Efficient and simple HTML/XML parsing library (bsd3, library, program)
    tagsoup-ht library and programs: alternative parser for the tagsoup package (deprecated, gpl, library, program)
    tamarin-prover program: The Tamarin prover for security protocol analysis. (gpl, program)
    task program: A command line tool for keeping track of tasks you worked on (bsd3, program)
    tasty-integrate programs: automated integration of QuickCheck properties into tasty suites (bsd3, program)
    tccli program: TokyoCabinet CLI interface (bsd3, program)
    tellbot program: IRC tellbot (gpl, program)
    tempus program: Interpreter for the FRP language Tempus (bsd3, program)
    termbox-bindings library and program: Bindings to the Termbox library (bsd3, library, program)
    tersmu program: A semantic parser for lojban (gpl, program)
    test-sandbox-compose library and program: Lightweight development enviroments using test-sandbox (bsd3, library, program)
    testPkg program: Small test package (program)
    testpattern program: Display a monitor test pattern (bsd3, program)
    tetris program: A 2-D clone of Tetris (bsd3, program)
    tex2txt library and program: LaTeX to plain-text conversion (gpl, library, program)
    text-ldap library and programs: Parser and Printer for LDAP text data stream (bsd3, library, program)
    textmatetags program: A simple Haskell program to provide tags for Haskell code completion in TextMate (mit, program)
    tftp library and program: A library for building tftp servers (bsd3, library, program)
    themoviedb library and program: Haskell API bindings for http://themoviedb.org (library, mit, program)
    themplate program: themplate (bsd3, program)
    theoremquest-client program: A simple client for the TheoremQuest theorem proving game. (bsd3, program)
    thih library and program: Typing Haskell In Haskell (bsd3, library, program)
    thimk programs: Command-line spelling word suggestion tool (bsd3, deprecated, program)
    threadPool program: Runs other programs in the manner of a thread pool (gpl, program)
    threads-supervisor library and program: Simple, IO-based library for Erlang-style thread supervision (library, mit, program)
    threadscope program: A graphical tool for profiling parallel Haskell programs. (bsd3, program)
    tianbar library and program: A desktop bar based on WebKit (library, mit, program)
    tic-tac-toe program: Useful if reading "Why FP matters" by John Hughes (bsd3, program)
    tiger program: Tiger Compiler of Universiteit Utrecht (bsd3, program)
    timberc program: The Timber Compiler. (bsd3, program)
    time-exts library and program: Efficient Timestamps (bsd3, library, program)
    time-series library and program: Time series analysis. (gpl, library, program)
    timecalc program: (mit, program)
    timeconsole program: Time commands by lines of STDOUT (gpl, program)
    timeplot program: A tool for visualizing time series from log files. (bsd3, program)
    timestamp-subprocess-lines program: Run a command and timestamp its stdout/stderr lines (bsd3, program)
    timestamper program: Read standard input and prepend each line with a timestamp (mit, program)
    tip-haskell-frontend library and program: Convert from Haskell to Tip (bsd3, library, program)
    tip-lib library and program: tons of inductive problems - support library and tools (bsd3, library, program)
    tls-debug programs: Set of programs for TLS testing and debugging (bsd3, program)
    tmpl program: simple executable for templating (gpl, program)
    tn program: A simple daily journal program (gpl, program)
    todos library and program: Easy-to-use TODOs manager. (bsd3, library, program)
    toilet program: Manage the toilet queue at the IMO (gpl, program)
    toktok library and programs: (gpl, library, program)
    toolshed library and program: Utilities used by other packages. (gpl, library, program)
    topkata program: OpenGL Arcade Game (gpl, program)
    touched library and program: Library (and cli) to execute a procedure on file change. (library, mit, program)
    toysolver library and programs: Assorted decision procedures for SAT, Max-SAT, PB, MIP, etc (bsd3, library, program)
    trajectory library and programs: Tools and a library for working with Trajectory. (bsd3, library, program)
    transf library and program: Text transformer and interpreter. (bsd3, library, program)
    transformations library and program: Generic representation of tree transformations (gpl, library, program)
    traypoweroff program: Tray Icon application to PowerOff / Reboot computer (bsd3, program)
    treemap-html-tools library and programs: Treemap related commands for producing foldable TreeMap HTML. (bsd3, deprecated, library, program)
    treeviz library and program: Visualization of computation decomposition trees. (bsd3, library, program)
    trimpolya program: Search for, annotate and trim poly-A tail (gpl, program)
    truelevel program: Audio file compressor-limiter (bsd3, program)
    trurl library and program: Haskell template code generator (bsd3, library, program)
    tsp-viz program: Real time TSP tour visualization. (bsd3, program)
    tttool program: Working with files for the Tiptoi pen (mit, program)
    tup-functor library and program: Homogeneous tuples (bsd3, library, program)
    turing-music program: Plays music generated by Turing machines with 5 states and 2 symbols (bsd3, program)
    turni program: shifts scheduling tool (bsd3, program)
    twhs library and program: CLI twitter client. (library, mit, program)
    twidge program: Unix Command-Line Twitter and Identica Client (gpl, program)
    twitter program: A Haskell-based CLI Twitter client (bsd3, program)
    txt-sushi library and programs: The SQL link in your *NIX chain (bsd3, library, program)
    txt2rtf program: Filter to convert plain text files to RTF (gpl, program)
    typalyze programs: Analyzes Haskell source files for easy reference (bsd3, program)
    typeof program: Small script for inferring types (bsd3, program)
    typescript-docs program: A documentation generator for TypeScript Definition files (mit, program)
    uAgda program: A simplistic dependently-typed language with parametricity. (program)
    uacpid program: Userspace Advanced Configuration and Power Interface event daemon (bsd3, program)
    uhc-light library and programs: Part of UHC packaged as cabal/hackage installable library (bsd3, library, program)
    uhexdump program: hex dumper for UTF-8 text (bsd3, program)
    uhttpc library and program: Minimal HTTP client library optimized for benchmarking (gpl, library, program)
    ui-command library and program: A framework for friendly commandline programs (bsd3, library, program)
    una program: Universal un-archiver utility (bsd3, program)
    unicoder library and program: Make writing in unicode easy. (bsd3, library, program)
    unlambda library and program: Unlambda interpreter (gpl, library, program)
    unlit library and program: Tool to convert literate code between styles or to code. (bsd3, library, program)
    unscramble program: Solve Boggle-like word games (mit, program)
    unusable-pkg program: Utility construction of the graph depending unusable packages. (bsd3, program)
    up program: Command line tool to generate pathnames to facilitate moving upward in a file system. (bsd3, program)
    up-grade program: Software management tool (program)
    ureader program: Minimalistic CLI RSS reader. (bsd3, program)
    urembed program: Ur/Web static content generator (bsd3, program)
    uri-template library and program: URI template library for Haskell (bsd3, library, program)
    urlcheck program: Parallel link checker (bsd3, program)
    urldecode program: Decode percent-encoded strings. (bsd3, program)
    urxml program: XML parser-printer supporting Ur/Web syntax extensions (program, public-domain)
    utf8-prelude library and program: Variants of Prelude and System.IO with UTF8 text I/O operations (bsd3, deprecated, library, program)
    uu-cco-examples programs: Utilities for compiler construction: example programs (bsd3, program)
    uuagc library and program: Attribute Grammar System of Universiteit Utrecht (bsd3, library, program)
    uuagc-bootstrap library and program: Attribute Grammar System of Universiteit Utrecht (bsd3, library, program)
    uuagd library and program: A debugger for the UUAG system. (library, program)
    v4l2-examples programs: video for linux two examples (bsd3, program)
    vacuum-opengl library and program: Visualize live Haskell data structures using vacuum, graphviz and OpenGL. (library, program, public-domain)
    vado library and programs: Runs commands on remote machines using ssh (library, mit, program)
    vampire library and program: Analyze and visualize expression trees. (gpl, library, program)
    varan programs: Process mpileup output to identify significant differences (gpl, program)
    vcsgui library and programs: GUI library for source code management systems (gpl, library, program)
    vcswrapper library and program: Wrapper for source code management systems (gpl, library, program)
    vimus library and program: An MPD client with vim-like key bindings (library, mit, program)
    vintage-basic program: Interpreter for microcomputer-era BASIC (bsd3, program)
    virthualenv program: Virtual Haskell Environment builder (bsd3, program)
    vision program: An XMMS2 client. (gpl, program)
    visual-graphrewrite library and program: Visualize the graph-rewrite steps of a Haskell program (bsd3, library, program)
    visual-prof program: Create a visual profile of a program's source code (bsd3, program)
    vk-posix-pty library and program: Pseudo terminal interaction with subprocesses. (bsd3, library, program)
    vty library and program: A simple terminal UI library (bsd3, library, program)
    vty-examples programs: Examples programs using the vty library. (bsd3, program)
    vty-menu library and program: A lib for displaying a menu and getting a selection using VTY (gpl, library, program)
    waddle library and programs: DOOM WAD file utilities. (bsd3, library, program)
    wai-app-static library and program: WAI application for static serving (library, mit, program)
    wai-handler-devel library and programs: WAI server that automatically reloads code after modification. (deprecated) (deprecated, library, mit, program)
    wai-middleware-crowd library and program: Middleware and utilities for using Atlassian Crowd authentication (library, mit, program)
    warp-dynamic library and program: Dynamic configurable warp HTTP server (bsd3, library, program)
    warp-static program: Static file server based on Warp and wai-app-static (deprecated) (deprecated, mit, program)
    watchit library and program: File change watching utility (bsd3, library, program)
    wavconvert program: Command-line tool for converting audio files and filling in ID3 tags (bsd3, program)
    wavy library and programs: Process WAVE files in Haskell. (bsd3, library, program)
    webidl library and programs: Parser and Pretty Printer for the Web IDL Language (bsd3, library, program)
    webify program: webfont generator (mit, program)
    websnap program: Transforms URLs to PNGs (bsd3, program)
    wedding-announcement program: a wedding announcement (program, public-domain)
    wedged program: Wedged postcard generator. (program)
    whim library and program: A Haskell window manager (bsd3, library, program)
    whitespace program: Whitespace, an esoteric programming language. (gpl, program)
    wikipedia4epub library and program: Wikipedia EPUB E-Book construction from Firefox history. (bsd3, library, program)
    win-hp-path library and program: Work with multiple Haskell Platform versions on Windows (bsd3, library, program)
    witty program: A network server to show bottlenecks of GHC (bsd3, program)
    wobsurv library and program: A simple and highly performant HTTP file server (library, mit, program)
    woffex program: Web Open Font Format (WOFF) unpacker. (bsd3, program)
    wol library and program: Send a Wake on LAN Magic Packet (bsd3, library, program)
    wolf library and programs: Amazon Simple Workflow Service Wrapper. (library, mit, program)
    wordpass library and program: Dictionary-based password generator (bsd3, library, program)
    wordsearch library and program: A word search solver library and executable (bsd3, library, program)
    wordsetdiff program: Compare two files as sets of N-tuples of words. (bsd3, program)
    wp-archivebot program: Subscribe to a wiki's RSS feed and archive external links (bsd3, program)
    wsedit program: A small tool to list, add and remove webseeds from a torrent file (gpl, program)
    wxAsteroids program: Try to avoid the asteroids with your space ship (bsd3, program)
    wxFruit library and program: An implementation of Fruit using wxHaskell. (bsd3, library, program)
    wxdirect library and program: helper tool for building wxHaskell (bsd3, library, program)
    wxhnotepad program: An example of how to implement a basic notepad with wxHaskell (bsd3, program)
    wxturtle library and program: turtle like LOGO with wxHaskell (bsd3, library, program)
    wyvern program: An autoresponder for Dragon Go Server. (bsd3, program)
    x509-util program: Utility for X509 certificate and chain (bsd3, program)
    xbattbar program: Simple battery indicator (mit, program)
    xcffib library and program: A cffi-based python binding for X (library, program)
    xchat-plugin library and program: XChat (gpl, library, program)
    xdot library and program: Parse Graphviz xdot files and interactively view them using GTK and Cairo (bsd3, library, program)
    xilinx-lava library and programs: The Lava system for Xilinx FPGA design with layout combinators. (bsd3, library, program)
    xkcd program: Downloads the most recent xkcd comic. (bsd3, program)
    xlsx library and program: Simple and incomplete Excel file parser/writer (excel, library, mit, ooxml, program, xlsx)
    xlsx-templater library and program: Simple and incomplete Excel file templater (library, mit, program)
    xml-prettify library and program: Pretty print XML. (bsd3, library, program)
    xml-to-json library and program: Library and command line tool for converting XML files to json (library, mit, program)
    xml-to-json-fast library and program: Fast, light converter of xml to json capable of handling huge xml files (library, mit, program)
    xml2json library and program: translate xml to json (bsd3, library, program)
    xml2x program: Convert BLAST output in XML format to CSV or HTML (gpl, program)
    xmltv library and program: Show tv channels in the terminal (library, mit, program)
    xmobar program: A Minimalistic Text Based Status Bar (bsd3, program)
    xmonad program: A tiling window manager (bsd3, program)
    xmonad-bluetilebranch program: A tiling window manager (bsd3, deprecated, program)
    xmonad-utils programs: A small collection of X utilities (bsd3, program)
    xournal-convert library and program: convert utility for xoj files (bsd3, library, program)
    xsact programs: Cluster EST sequences (gpl, program)
    y0l0bot program: #plaimi's all-encompassing bot (agpl, program)
    yabi program: Yet Another Brainfuck Interpreter (mit, program)
    yabi-muno library and program: Yet Another Brainfuck Interpreter (library, mit, program)
    yackage program: Personal Hackage replacement for testing new packages. (bsd3, program)
    yaml2owl program: Generate OWL schema from YAML syntax, and an RDFa template. (lgpl, program)
    yampa-glfw library and program: Connects GLFW-b (GLFW 3+) with the Yampa FRP library (gpl, library, program)
    yampa2048 program: 2048 game clone using Yampa/Gloss (mit, program)
    yavie library and program: yet another visual editor (bsd3, library, program)
    yeganesh programs: small dmenu wrapper (bsd3, program)
    yes-precure5-command library and program: Extended yes command to reproduce phrases in Yes! Precure 5. (library, mit, program)
    yesod-bin programs: The yesod helper executable. (mit, program)
    yesod-continuations library and program: Continuations for Yesod (bsd3, library, program)
    yesod-dsl library and program: DSL for generating Yesod subsite to manage an RDBMS; (bsd3, library, program)
    yesod-examples programs: Example programs using the Yesod Web Framework. (deprecated) (bsd3, deprecated, program)
    yesod-vend library and program: Simple CRUD classes for easy view creation for Yesod (bsd3, library, program)
    yet-another-logger library and program: Yet Another Logger (apache, library, program)
    yi library and program: The Haskell-Scriptable Editor (gpl, library, program)
    yjftp library and program: CUI FTP client like 'ftp', 'ncftp' (gpl, library, program)
    yjftp-libs library and program: CUI FTP client like 'ftp', 'ncftp' (gpl, library, program)
    youtube programs: Upload video to YouTube via YouTube API (bsd3, program)
    yql library and program: A YQL engine to execute Open Data Tables (bsd2, library, program)
    yst program: Builds a static website from templates and data in YAML or CSV files. (gpl, program)
    yuuko library and program: A transcendental HTML parser gently wrapping the HXT library (bsd3, library, program)
    yxdb-utils library and programs: Utilities for reading and writing Alteryx .yxdb files (gpl, library, program)
    zampolit program: A tool for checking how much work is done on group projects. (bsd3, program)
    zeno program: An automated proof system for Haskell programs (mit, program)
    zeroth library and program: ZeroTH - remove unnecessary TH dependencies (bsd3, library, program)
    zmcat library and program: Command-line tool for ZeroMQ. (bsd3, library, program)
    zmqat program: A socat-like tool for zeromq library (program)
    zoom library and program: A rake/thor-like task runner written in Haskell (bsd3, library, program)
    zoom-cache library and program: A streamable, seekable, zoomable cache file format (bsd3, library, program)
    zoom-cache-sndfile program: Tools for generating zoom-cache-pcm files (lgpl, program)
    zot program: Zot language (bsd3, program)
    zsh-battery program: Ascii bars representing battery status (bsd3, program)
    ztail program: Multi-file, colored, filtered log tailer. (bsd3, program)
